 1460  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 America’s Changing Population As the ­twenty-​­first century dawned, the United States began experiencing ­dramatic social changes. In 2015 the country’s population surpassed 322 million, more than 80 percent of whom lived in cities or suburbs. Even more important, the nation’s racial and ethnic composition was changing rapidly. In 1980, the population was 80 percent white. By 2015, that percentage had fallen below 63 percent. In 2005, Hispanics became the nation’s largest minority group. In 1980, Hispanics were 6 percent; in 2015, that number had tripled to 18 percent and was growing rapidly. More than 56 million Americans were Hispanic in origin, and a third of them were under the age of eighteen. African Americans were at 13 percent, Asians about 8 percent, and Native Americans 1 percent. The rate of increase among those four groups was twice what it had been during the 1980s. Yet the ­fastest-​­growing group in the nation were the nearly 10 million who described themselves as “multiracial,” representing more than 3 percent of the entire population. The primary cause of this dramatic change in the nation’s ethnic mix was a surge of immigration. In 2015, the United States had more ­foreign-​­born residents than ever ­before—​­more than 45 million, 11 million of whom were undocumented immigrants (formerly classified as “illegal aliens”). In the first decade of the ­twenty-​­first century, the United States became home to more than twice as many immigrants as all other countries combined. For the first time, the majority of immigrants came not from Europe but from other parts of the world: Asia, Latin America, and Africa. Mexicans made up the largest share of Hispanics, followed by Puerto Ricans and Cubans. Asian Americans increased their numbers at a faster rate than any other ethnic group, largely because of a surge in Chinese immigrants. The nation’s changing ethnic composition has had an increasingly significant impact on social life. In 1980, Hispanic Americans lived mainly in five states: California, Arizona, New Mexico, Texas, and Florida. By 2014, every state had a rapidly growing Hispanic population. Demographers projected that by 2044, whites would become a minority in the United States. Immigration also is having potent political effects, as almost 1 million ­Hispanics reach voting age each year. Hispanics are usually Catholic and tend to vote Democratic. In 1980, there were six Hispanic Americans serving in the U.S. Congress. By 2010, there were more than five times as many. In 1992, Hispanics constituted only 2 percent of American voters; by 2014, they were 10 percent.

 America’s Changing Population  1461

 Over the quota, under the radar Large numbers of Chinese risked their lives to gain entry to the United States during the late twentieth century. A freighter carrying undocumented immigrants ran aground near Rockaway Beach, New York, in June 1993, forcing its undocumented passengers to swim ashore.

 Only 23 percent of baby boomers born during and after the Second World War consider the surge in American diversity a “change for the ­better.” They worry that Hispanics will always be a race apart from m ­ ainstream ­American culture, a permanent underclass of people tied closely to their ­ancestral ­homelands. Yet such concerns are countered by growing ­evidence that Hispanics are integrating themselves into American society and ­embracing its ideals. High school graduation and college enrollment rates among Hispanics are rising, teen pregnancy is falling, and more and more are learning English. In recent years, more than a quarter of Hispanic marriages have involved a ­non-​­Hispanic partner. Far from being a disaster, the growing Hispanic ­population is providing the nation with a surge of youthful energy and ­vitality—​­and demonstrating such traditional American attributes as self-​­ ­­ reliance, rugged individualism, thrift, close family ties, strong religious beliefs, disproportionate participation in the military, and an ethic of hard work.

 1462  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

The Clinton Presidency
 Bill Clinton arrived at the White House in 1993 with an almost legendary combination of strengths and weaknesses. At ­forty-​­six years old, he was the third youngest president in history, only slightly older than John Kennedy and Theodore Roosevelt. Like Ronald Reagan, Clinton charmed people, and his speeches inspired them. He was shrewdly smart, full of energy, resilient, persistent, and a ­self-​­described “policy wonk” who loved debating the fine points of new legislative ideas. Clinton resembled Jimmy Carter in his determination to be a “centrist” Democrat who reached out to w ­ orking-​­and m ­ iddle-​­class voters who no longer trusted liberals “to take their tax money and spend it with discipline.” Yet while graced with charm and a common touch with voters, as well as a commitment to fulfilling his campaign pledges, Clinton was also prone to ­self-​ ­absorption, ­self-​­deception, and ­self-​­inflicted wounds. A sucker for flattery with a compulsion to please and to be loved, he often seemed to decide his stances on issues by finding out what others believed, by studying the results of focus group interviews and public opinion surveys. A creature of both inspired leadership abilities and unruly passions, he at times seemed less a president than a flawed good ol’ boy capable of ­self-​­righteous sleaziness and shameless misbehavior (he would dismiss his impeachment as “just a political deal”). In sum, Clinton was a bundle of warring impulses whose faults often confounded his talents. Yet he displayed legendary energy and “slick” resilience. (His nickname was the “Comeback Kid.”) He thrived amid storms. One of his advisers predicted that Clinton would make every mistake possible, “but he will only make it once.” Like Jimmy Carter, Clinton’s career as a governor did not prepare him well for some of his presidential duties. His inexperience in international affairs and congressional maneuvering led to several missteps in his first year as president. Like George H. W. Bush before him, he reneged on several campaign promises. In a bruising battle with Congress, he was forced to abandon his proposed m ­ iddle-​­class tax cut to keep another campaign promise to reduce the federal deficit. Then he dropped his promise to allow gays to serve openly in the armed forces after military commanders expressed strong opposition. He later announced an ambiguous policy that came to be known as “don’t ask, don’t tell” (DADT), which allowed gays, lesbians, and bisexuals to serve in the military but only if they kept their sexual orientation secret. “I got the worst of both worlds,” Clinton later confessed. “I lost the fight, and the gay community was highly critical of me for the compromise.” In his first two weeks in office, his approval rating dropped 20 percent. Throughout his presidency, however, he displayed a remarkable ability to manage crises and rebound from adversity.

The Clinton Presidency  1463


 the economy

 As a candidate, Bill Clinton had pledged to reduce the federal deficit without damaging the economy or hurting the nation’s most vulnerable people. To this end, he proposed $241 billion in higher taxes for corporations and for the wealthiest individuals (the top income tax rate rising from 33 to 39.6 percent) over four years, and $255 billion in spending cuts over the same period. The hotly contested bill passed the ­Democratic-​ NAFTA protesters Protesters going to ­controlled Congress by the slimmest a rally against NAFTA, the controversial of margins: 218 to 216 in the House free trade agreement for North America. and 51 to 50 in the Senate, with Vice President Al Gore providing the ­tie-​ ­breaking vote. In the end, t­he deficit-​­reduction effort worked as planned. It led to lower interest rates, which, along with low energy prices, helped spur dramatic ­economic growth. Equally difficult was gaining congressional approval of the North ­American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA), which the Bush administration had negotiated with Canada and Mexico. Clinton urged approval of NAFTA, which would make North America the largest free-trade zone in the world. Opponents favored tariffs to discourage the importation of cheaper foreign products, especially from Mexico. Yet Clinton prevailed with solid ­Republican support while losing a sizable minority of Democrats, mostly labor unionists and southerners, who feared that textile mills would lose business (and millions of jobs) to “cheap labor” c­ ountries—​­as they did.

 health care reform

 Clinton’s primary ­public-​­policy initiative was an ambitious plan to overhaul the nation’s h ­ ealth care system. “If I don’t get health care,” he declared, “I’ll wish I didn’t run for president.” ­Public ­support for ­government-​­administered health insurance had spread as annual medical costs skyrocketed and some 37 million Americans, most of them poor or unemployed, went without it. The Clinton administration argued that providing medical insurance to everyone, regardless of income, would reduce the costs of health care to the nation as a whole, but critics questioned the savings as well as the ability of the federal government to manage such a huge program. The grand plan, known as the Health Security Act, called for large corporations to pay for most of the

 1464  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century A ­ merica 1993–Present

 medical insurance expenses of their employees and required small businesses to form “health alliances” so that they, too, could provide subsidized health insurance to their workers. By the summer of 1994, Clinton’s 1,364-page h ­ealth ​­ insurance plan, ­developed by a task force headed by the First Lady, Hillary Rodham Clinton, was doomed, in part because the president opposed any changes and in part because the report was impossibly complicated. Strenuously opposed by Republicans and ­health ​­care interest groups, especially the pharmaceutical and insurance industries, Clinton’s prized bill was voted down by Congress in August 1994.

 landslide republican victory

 The ­health ​­care bill disaster influenced the 1994 midterm elections. In the most stunning congressional victory of the twentieth century, the Republicans captured both houses of Congress and won 32 governorships, including the largest states of California, New York, and Texas, where George W. Bush, the son of the former president and a future president himself, won handily. The Republican victory was led by a combative Georgia conservative named Newton (“Newt”) Leroy Gingrich. In early 1995, he became the first Republican Speaker of the House in ­forty-​­two years. Gingrich, a former history professor with a lust for controversy and an unruly ego, was a superb tactician who had helped mobilize religious and social conservatives associated with the Christian Coalition. The Christian Coalition, organized by television evangelist Pat Robertson in 1989 to replace Jerry Falwell’s Moral Majority (which had disbanded that year), was ­pro–​­school prayer, a­ nti-​­abortion, a­ nti-​­feminist, and ­anti–​­gay rights. In addition to celebrating “traditional family values,” it urged politicians to “radically downsize” government. Ralph Reed, a ­born-​­again Christian political activist who would head the Christian Coalition, declared that Christians needed “to take back this country.” In many respects, the religious Right took control of the political and social landscape in the nineties. In 1994, Gingrich and his fellow Republicans rallied conservative voters by promising a Contract with America, a pledge to dismantle the “corrupt liberal welfare state” created by Democrats. The ten-​­point, ­anti-​­big-​­government “contract” ­promised a smaller federal government by reducing the regulation of businesses, environmental protections, requiring term limits for members of Congress, slashing ­social-​­welfare programs, and passing a constitutional ­amendment requiring a balanced annual ­federal budget. As Texan Tom DeLay, a leading House Republican, explained, “You’ve got to understand, we are

The Clinton Presidency  1465


 i­deologues. We have an agenda. We have a ­ philosophy.” Yet the m ­ uch-​ trumpeted Contract with America ­ quickly fizzled. The conservatives pushed too hard and too fast, realizing too late that their slim majority in Congress could not launch a revolution. They were able to pass only four minor elements of their “contract.” Gingrich’s ­heavy-​­handed methods Newt Gingrich Joined by 160 of his fellow House Republicans, Gingrich contributed to the disintegration of promotes the Contract with America in the Contract with America. Repub- April 1995. lican senator Bob Dole said Gingrich was “a o ­ ne-​­man band who rarely took advice.” He was too ambitious, too abrasive, too divisive. When Clinton refused to go along with Republican demands for a ­balanced-​­budget pledge, Gingrich twice shut down the federal government during the fall of 1995. The tactic backfired. By 1996, Republicans abandoned the Contract with America, in part because Gingrich had higher negative r­ atings in public surveys than the president.

 the supreme court and race

 The conservative mood also revealed itself in Supreme Court rulings that undermined a­ ffirmative-​­action programs, which gave African American students special consideration in ­college admissions and financial aid awards. Between 1970 and 1977, ­African American enrollment in colleges and universities doubled, even as white ­students and their parents complained about “reverse discrimination.” In 1996, two major rulings affected affirmative action in college a­ dmissions. In Hopwood v. Texas, a federal court ruled that race could not be used as a ­consideration for admission. Later that year, California voters passed Proposition 209 (also known as the California Civil Rights Initiative or CCRI), which ruled out preferential treatment (“affirmative action”) in government hiring, government contracting, and public schools based on race, sex, ethni­ city, or national origin. Similar complaints were directed against ­affirmative-​ action programs that awarded government contracts to m ­ ­ inority-​­ owned businesses. In 1995, the Court in Adarand Constructors v. Peña declared that ­affirmative-​­action programs had to be “narrowly tailored” to serve a “compelling national interest.” The implication of such vague language was clear: the Court had come to share the growing public suspicion of the value

 1466  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 and ­legitimacy of ­programs designed to benefit a particular race, gender, or ethnic group.

 legislative breakthrough After the surprising 1994 Republican takeover of Congress, Bill Clinton shrewdly resolved to save his presidency by reinforcing his claim that he was a “centrist.” He ­co-​­opted much of the energy of the conservative movement by announcing that “the era of big government is over” and by reforming the federal system of welfare payments to the poor, created during the 1930s under the New Deal. Late in the summer of 1996, the Republican Congress passed a comprehensive ­welfare-​­reform measure that Clinton signed after some revisions. The Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Act of 1996 (PRWOA) illustrated Clinton’s efforts to move the Democratic party away from the liberalism it had promoted since the 1930s. PRWOA abolished the Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC) program, which provided poor families with almost $8,000 a year, and replaced it with the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, which limited the duration of welfare payments to two years in an effort to encourage unemployed people to get ­self-​­supporting jobs. Liberal Democrats bitterly criticized Clinton’s “welfare reform” deal. Yet the new approach to supporting the poor was a statistical success. Both the number of welfare recipients and poverty rates declined during the late ­nineties, leading the editors of the l­ eft-​­leaning New Republic to report that the PRWOA had “worked much as its designers had hoped.” the 1996 campaign

 The Republican takeover of Congress in 1994 gave the party hope that they could prevent President Clinton’s reelection. After clinching the Republican presidential nomination in 1996, Senate majority leader Bob Dole resigned his seat to devote his attention to the campaign. Clinton, however, maintained a large lead in the polls. With an improving economy and no major f­ oreign-​­policy crises, cultural and personal issues surged into prominence. Concern about Dole’s age (­seventy-​­three) and his gruff public personality, as well as tensions between economic conservatives and social conservatives over volatile issues such as abortion and gun control, hampered Dole’s efforts to generate widespread support, especially among independent voters. ­Clinton was able to frame the election as a stark choice between Dole’s desire to build a bridge to the past and Clinton’s promise to build a bridge to the future. On November 5, 1996, Clinton won a second term with an electoral vote victory of 379 to 159 and 49 percent of the popular vote. Dole received 41 percent of the popular vote, and ­third-​­party candidate Ross Perot got 8 percent.

The Clinton Presidency  1467


 the “new economy”

 Bill Clinton’s presidency benefited from a prolonged period of unprecedented economic prosperity. During his last three years in office (1998–2000), the federal government generated ­unheard-​­of budget surpluses. What came to be called the “new economy” featured h ­ igh-​ ­flying electronics, computer, software, telecommunications (cellular phones, cable TV, etc.), and ­e-​­commerce Internet firms called “­dot-​­com” companies. These dynamic “tech” enterprises helped the economy set records in every area: low inflation, low unemployment, corporate profits, and personal fortunes. The ­stock-​­market value of U.S. companies nearly tripled, and people began to claim that the new economy defied the b ­ oom-​­and-​­bust cycles of the previous hundred years. Alan Greenspan, the Federal Reserve Board chairman, suggested that “we have moved beyond history” into an economy that seemed only to grow. He would be proven wrong.

 globalization

 Another major feature of the new economy was g­ lobalization. The end of the cold war and the disintegration of the Soviet Union opened many new opportunities for U.S. companies in international trade. In addition, new ­globe-​­spanning communication technologies and massive new ­container-​­carrying ships and cargo jets shortened time and distance, enabling United ­States–​­based multinational companies to conduct more business abroad. Bill Clinton accelerated the process of globalization. “The global economy,” he said, “is giving more of our own people, and billions around the world, the chance to work and live and raise their families with dignity.” He especially welcomed the World Wide Web, which opened the Internet to everyone, and, by doing so, greatly accelerated U.S. dominance of the international economy. By 2000, more than a third of the production of U.S. multinational ­companies was occurring abroad, compared with only 9 percent in 1980. In 1970, there were 7,000 American multinational companies; by 2000, the number had soared to 63,000. Many U.S. multinational companies pursued controversial “outsourcing” strategies by which they moved their production “offshore” to nations such as Mexico and China to take advantage of lower labor costs and fewer workplace and environmental regulations. At the same time, many European and Asian companies, especially automobile ­manufacturers, built large plants in the United States to reduce the shipping expenses required to get their products to American markets. The U.S. economy had become internationalized to such an extent that global concerns exercised an e­ ver-​ ­increasing influence on domestic and foreign policies.

 1468  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

Foreign Policy in the Nineties
 Unlike George H. W. Bush, Bill Clinton had little interest in global politics. Untrained and inexperienced in international relations, he had to focus on creating opportunities around the world for U.S. business expansion. Yet, as international analyst Leslie Gelb cautioned the new president, “A foreign economic policy is not a foreign policy, and it is not a national security strategy.” Events soon forced Clinton to intervene to help nations in crisis.

 haiti

 In 1990, the politically unstable Caribbean island nation of Haiti, the hemisphere’s poorest country, had installed its first democratically elected president, a popular Catholic priest named ­Jean-​­Bertrand Aristide. When Haitian army officers ousted Aristide the following year, he and thousands of his supporters took up exile in America, most of them settling in south ­Florida, which upset many Floridians. In 1994 President Clinton announced his intention to restore Aristide to power, in part to return the exiled “boat people” to their homeland. With ­drawn-​­out negotiations leading nowhere, Clinton asked in July for a UN resolution authorizing military intervention in Haiti. At that juncture, former president Jimmy Carter volunteered to help negotiate a ­last-​­minute settlement, and he convinced the military leaders to relinquish their control of the government and leave the nation. Clinton sent 20,000 U.S. troops to ensure a peaceful transfer of power. Aristide returned to Haiti on October 15, and on March 31, 1995, the U.S. peacekeeping troops left as a UN force commanded by an American general took over. But neither Aristide nor his successors were able to generate prosperity or stability.

 the middle east

 President Clinton continued George H. W. Bush’s policy of orchestrating patient negotiations between the Arabs and the Israelis. A new development was the inclusion of the Palestinian Liberation ­Organization (PLO). In 1993, secret talks between Israeli and Palestinian ­representatives resulted in a draft agreement between Israel and the PLO that provided for the restoration of Palestinian ­self-​­rule in the occupied Gaza Strip and in Jericho, on the West Bank, in a “land for peace” exchange as outlined in United Nations Security Council resolutions. A formal signing occurred at the White House on September 13, 1993. With Clinton presiding, Israeli prime minister Yitzhak Rabin and PLO leader Yasir Arafat exchanged handshakes, and their foreign ministers signed the agreement. The Middle East peace process suffered a terrible blow in early November 1995, however, when Rabin was assassinated by an Israeli zealot who

The Clinton Presidency  1469


 Clinton and the Middle East President Clinton presides as Israeli prime minister Yitzhak Rabin (left) and PLO leader Yasir Arafat (right) agree to a pathbreaking peace accord between Israel and the Palestinians, September 1993.

 resented the efforts to negotiate with the Palestinians. Some observers feared that the assassin had killed the peace process as well when, seven months later, conservative ­hard-​­liner Benjamin Netanyahu narrowly defeated the United ­States–​­backed Shimon Peres in the Israeli national elections. Yet in October 1998, Clinton brought Arafat, Netanyahu, and King Hussein of Jordan together at a conference in Maryland, where they reached an agreement. Under the Wye River Accords, Israel agreed to surrender land in return for security guarantees by the Palestinians.

 the balkans

 Clinton also felt compelled to address turmoil in the Eastern European nations now free from Soviet domination. In 1991, Yugoslavia had disintegrated into ethnic warfare as four of its six multiethnic republics declared their independence. Serb minorities, backed by the new Republic of Serbia, stirred up civil wars in neighboring Croatia and Bosnia. In Bosnia, the conflict involved systematic efforts to eliminate Muslims. Clinton decided that the situation was “intolerable” because the massacres of tens of ­thousands of people “tore at the very fabric” of human decency. He ordered food and m ­ edical supplies sent to besieged ­Bosnian Muslims and dispatched ­warplanes to stop the massacres. In 1995, U.S. negotiators finally persuaded the foreign ministers of Croatia, Bosnia, and Yugoslavia (by then a loose federation of the republics of S­ erbia and Montenegro) to agree to a comprehensive peace plan. Bosnia would remain

 1470  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 a single nation but would be divided into two states: a ­Muslim-​­Croat federation controlling 51 percent of the t­ erritory, and a ­Bosnian-​­Serb ­republic ­controlling the rest. Basic human rights would be restored, and free elections would be held. To enforce the agreement, 60,000 NATO peacekeeping troops were dispatched to Bosnia. In 1998, the Balkan tinderbox flared up again, this time in the ­ Yugoslav McRubble Pro-​­Milošević residents province of Kosovo, which had long of Belgrade, Yugoslavia, destroy the been considered sacred ground by storefront of a McDonald’s restaurant ­Christian Serbs, although 90 percent in 1999 to protest NATO and the United States’ airstrikes on their homeland. of the 2 million Kosovars were in fact Albanian Muslims. In 1998, Yugoslav president Slobodan MiloŠeviĆ began a program of “ethnic cleansing” whereby Yugoslav forces burned Albanian ­villages, murdered men, raped women, and displaced hundreds of thousands of Muslim Kosovars. On March 24, 1999, NATO, relying heavily upon U.S. military resources and leadership, launched air strikes against Yugoslavian military targets. After ­seventy-​­two days of bombardment, MiloŠeviĆ sued for peace on NATO’s terms, in part because his Russian allies had finally abandoned him. An agreement was reached on June 3, 1999, and Clinton pledged extensive U.S. aid to help the Yugoslavs rebuild.

The Scandal Machine
 For a time, Clinton’s preoccupation with foreign crises helped deflect attention from a growing number of investigations into his personal conduct. During his first term, he was dogged by old charges about investments he and his wife had made in Whitewater, a planned resort development in Arkansas. The project turned out to be a fraud and a failure, and the Clintons were accused of conspiring with the developer, although they lost $40,000 in the enterprise. In 1994, Kenneth Starr, a sanctimonious former judge and a conservative ­Republican, was appointed to investigate the Whitewater case. Starr did not uncover any evidence that the Clintons were directly involved in the Whitewater fraud, but in the course of another investigation he happened upon evidence of a White House sex scandal. For years, rumors had cir-

The Clinton Presidency  1471


 culated about the president’s dalliances with women. James Carville, Clinton’s political consultant, once asked Clinton about his sexual ­risk-​­taking. “Well,” Clinton replied, “they haven’t caught me.” He spoke too soon.

 monicagate

 Between 1995 and 1997, Clinton had engaged in a sexual affair with a t­ wenty-​­two-​­year-​­old White House intern, Monica Lewinsky. More disturbing, he had pressed her to lie about their ­relationship, even under oath. The news devastated the First Family and ­staggered the White House staff. Clinton’s press secretary, Dee Dee Myers, could not believe that her boss would risk his presidency “for something so frivolous, so reckless, so small.” Clinton initially denied the charges, telling the nation in late January 1998 that “I did not have sexual relations with that woman, Miss Lewinsky.” Yet the scandal would not disappear. For the next thirteen months, the media circus surrounding the “Monicagate” or “Zippergate” affair captured public attention. (After the Watergate affair in 1973–1974, journalists have loved to attach the suffix “-gate” to scandals.) Other women stepped forward to claim that Clinton had engaged in improper relations with them over the years, charges that the president denied. The First Lady, Hillary Clinton, grimly stood by her husband amid his ­self-​­inflicted agony, declaring that the sexual rumors were the result of a “vast ­right-​­wing conspiracy” to bring him down. With the economy booming, Clinton’s public approval ratings actually rose during 1998. In August, however, the scandal revived when Lewinsky agreed to provide a federal grand jury with a detailed account of her relationship with the president. Soon thereafter, Clinton became the first president to testify before a grand jury. On August 17, the ­self-​­pitying, defiant president admitted having had “inappropriate, intimate physical contact” with Lewinsky that was “wrong.” He also acknowledged that he had “misled” the American people. In his eagerness to keep himself in office, however, he insisted that he had done nothing illegal. Public reaction was mixed. A majority expressed sympathy for the president because of his public humiliation and because the Lewinsky affair was a private act of consensual sex. Others, however, were eager to see the president ­resign—​­or be impeached. Triumphant Republicans were convinced they could impeach the president.

 the impeachment of clinton

On September 9, 1998,
 ­ enneth Starr, the special prosecutor, submitted to Congress t­ hirty-​­six boxes K of documents that included a disturbingly graphic account of the president’s White House encounters with Lewinsky. The report claimed that there was “substantial and creditable” evidence of presidential wrongdoing (perjury,

 1472  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 obstructing justice, and abusing his presidential powers). The Starr report prompted the ­Republican-​­dominated House of Representatives on October 8 to begin a ­wide-​­ranging impeachment inquiry and led Bill Clinton to claim that he was the victim of a rogue prosecutor run amok. Starr “is evil,” the president charged. “When this thing is over, there’s only going to be one of us left standing. And it’s going to be me.” On December 19, 1998, William Jefferson Clinton was impeached (charged with “high crimes and misdemeanors”) by the House of Representatives. The House officially approved two articles of impeachment, charging Clinton with lying under oath to a federal grand jury and obstructing justice. He was the first elected president to be impeached. (Andrew Johnson was not elected; he became president upon the assassination of Abraham Lincoln.) House Speaker Newt Gingrich, who been had censured (officially condemned) by his Republican colleagues in 1997 for several “serious violations” of House rules, led the effort to impeach the president, even though he himself was, at the time, secretly engaged in a ­six-​­year-​­long affair with a congressional staff member. (Gingrich resigned as speaker in November 1998 and left both the House and his wife, escaping with his new wife from ­politics altogether.) Journalists began calling Clinton’s Senate trial the “soap opera” impeachment after Gingrich’s successor as Speaker, Robert Livingston of Louisiana, suddenly resigned from Congress in late December after admitting that he, too, had engaged in adulterous affairs. The impeachment trial began on January 7, 1999. Five weeks later, on February 12, a majority of senators, by a 55–45 vote, decided that Clinton’s adultery and lies were not the “high crimes and misdemeanors” required to remove a president from office. The president was a­ cquitted—​­much to the regret of many Republicans. The situation called to mind an old Texas saying: “We tried to hang him, but the rope broke.” Arthur Schlesinger Jr., the distinguished scholar of the presidency, called the ­Clinton-​­Lewinsky affair “the weirdest episode in our political history.” Though the impeachment effort failed, Clinton’s final eighteen months in office were stained and distracted by the scandal and many Americans were exhausted by the partisan drama and disenchanted with politics and politicians. Clinton’s last two years in office were anticlimactic.

 assessing the clinton presidency

 For all of his faults, Bill Clinton was the most compelling figure of his political generation. Both loved and hated, he presided over an unprecedented period of prosperity (115 consecutive months of economic growth and the lowest unemployment rate in 30 years), generated ­unheard-​­of federal budget surpluses, and passed a

A
Chaotic Start to a New Century 1473 

 Impeachment Representative Edward Pease, a member of the House Judiciary Committee, covers his face during the vote on the third of four articles of impeachment charging President Clinton with “high crimes and misdemeanors” in December 1998.

 ­ elfare-​­reform measure with support from both parties. In the process, he w revitalized the Democratic party by moving it from the left to the “vital center” of the ­political spectrum. By 1998, it was the Democrats, not the Republicans, who were viewed as the party of fiscal responsibility. Clinton also helped bring peace and stability to the Balkans, one of the most violent regions of Europe. At times, however, his boundless ­self-​­confidence led to arrogant recklessness. He debased the presidency with his sexual escapades, and his effort, undertaken with his wife, Hillary Rodham Clinton, to bring health i­nsurance to the uninsured was a clumsy failure. Clinton was less a great statesman than a great escape artist. In 2000, his last year in office, he enjoyed a ­public approval rating of 65 percent, the highest e­ nd-​­of-​­term rating since P ­ resident Dwight D. Eisenhower. Yet his popularity was not enough to ensure the ­election of his vice president, Al Gore, as his successor.

A
Chaotic Start to a New Century  Wild celebrations around the world ushered in the year 2000, and Americans led the cheering. They greeted the new century with a sense of triumphalism. The Cold War was over, the United States was the world’s only hyperpower,

 1474  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 and the ­high-​­tech American economy dominated global trade. But the joyous mood did not last. Powerful and unstable new forces were emerging, the most dangerous of which were sophisticated global networks of menacing terrorists eager to disrupt and destroy American values and institutions.

A
Disputed Election  The presidential election of 2000 proved to be one of the closest and most controversial in history. The two m ­ ­ ajor-​­ party candidates, Vice President Albert Gore Jr., the Democrat, and Texas governor George W. Bush, son of the ­former Republican president, offered contrasting views on the role of the ­federal ­government, tax cuts, environmental policies, and the best way to ­preserve Social Security and Medicare. Gore, a Tennessee native and Harvard graduate whose father had been a prominent senator, favored an active federal government that would do much

THE ELECTION OF 2000 WA OR

 CA

MT ID

 NV

 ND

WY UT

 AZ

 CO

 SD

KS OK

 NM

 AK

■


 NH 4 VT 3 WI

 MI

 IA

 NE

TX HI

 MN

PA OH IL IN 21 WV VA 22 12 MO 5 13 KY 8 NC TN 11 AR SC MS AL GA LA FL

George W. Bush
(Republican)
Al Gore
(Democrat)


Figure M32_1
 First proof

 MA 12 RI 4 CT 8 NJ 15 DE 3 MD 10 DC 2

Electoral Vote Popular Vote
50,500,000


 Why was the 2000 presidential election so close? was the conflict over the election results resolved?

 WWN64 ■ How

 NY

 ME

51,000,000


A
Chaotic Start to a New Century 1475 

 more to protect the environment. Bush campaigned on a theme of “compassionate conservatism,” promised to restore “honor and dignity” to the White House, and proposed to transfer power from the federal government to the states. A “­ born-​­ again” evangelical Christian with degrees from Yale ­University and Harvard Business School, Bush urged tax cuts and a more “humble” ­ foreign policy that would end U.S. efforts to install democratic governments in undemocratic societies (“nation building”). The bitter tone of party politics (called polarization) continued to inspire candidates at the extremes to run as ­ third-​­ party candidates. Two independent candidates added zest to The recount In yet another recount the 2000 presidential campaign: the col- on November 24, 2000, Judge Robert orful conservative commentator Patrick Rosenberg examines a ballot with Buchanan, and the liberal consumer a magnifying glass. That Florida’s activist Ralph Nader, representing the voting machines were so unreliable introduced doubt about the legitimacy Green party. of the close results. The November election created high drama. The television networks i­nitially reported that Gore had narrowly won the state of Florida and its decisive ­twenty-​ ­five electoral votes. Later in the evening, however, they reversed themselves, saying that Florida was too close to call. In the chaotic e­ arly-​­morning hours, the networks declared that Bush had been elected president. The final tally showed Bush with a r­ azor-​­thin lead, but Florida law required a recount. For the first time in 125 years, the results of a presidential election remained in doubt for weeks after the voting. As a painstaking hand recount proceeded, supporters of Bush and Gore sparred in the courts. Each side accused the other of trying to steal the e­ lection. The political drama lasted for five weeks, until, on D ­ ecember 12, a b ­ itterly divided U.S. Supreme Court decided, with a 5–4 m ­ ajority ruling, that the recount was to be halted. Bush was declared the winner in ­Florida by 537 votes. Gore had amassed a 540,000-vote lead nationwide, but l­ osing ­Florida meant he lost in the electoral college by two votes. Although Gore “strongly disagreed” with the

 1476  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century A ­ merica 1993–Present

 Supreme Court’s decision, he asked voters to rally around ­President-​­elect Bush and move forward. “Partisan rancor,” he urged, “must be put aside.” The ferocious sparring between the two national parties was not put aside, however, in part because Bush chose as key advisers men known for their brusqueness and strong ideological convictions. One of them, R ­ ichard “Dick” Cheney, a former Wyoming congressman and influential m ­ ember of the Nixon, Ford, and Bush administrations, quickly became the most p ­ owerful vice ­president in history. Cheney, so secretive that he often appeared ­sinister, used his long experience with the government bureaucracy to fill the ­administration with ­like-​­minded associates who helped him control the flow of information to the president. He became a domineering influence on the inexperienced Bush.

A
Change of Direction  George W. Bush had promised to cut taxes for the wealthy, increase military spending, oppose strict environmental regulations, and “privatize” Social Security by investing workers’ retirement pension funds in the stock market. First, however, he had to deal with a sputtering economy. By March 2001, the economy was in recession for the first time in more than a decade. Bush decided that cutting taxes was the best way to boost economic growth. On June 7, 2001, he signed the Economic Growth and Tax Relief Act, which cut $1.35 trillion in taxes. Instead of paying for themselves in renewed economic growth, however, the Bush tax cuts led to a sharp drop in federal revenue, producing in turn a ­fast-​­growing budget deficit as the Clinton surpluses were quickly used up. Huge increases in the costs of Medicare and Medicaid resulting from the aging of the baby boom generation contributed to the soaring deficits, as did m ­ ilitary expenditures caused by an unexpected war. Bush was also distracted by global crises. Islamic militants around the world bitterly resented what they viewed as the “imperial” globalization of U.S. culture and power. With increasing frequency, they used terrorism, including suicide bombings, to gain notoriety, exact vengeance, and generate fear and insecurity. Throughout the nineties, the United States had fought a losing struggle against global terrorist groups, in part because terrorism thrives in nations with weak governments overwhelmed by rapid population growth, scarce resources, widespread poverty, and huge numbers of unemployed young ­men—​­symptoms many nations were suffering. The ineffectiveness of U.S. ­intelligence agencies in tracking the movements and intentions of militant extremists became tragically evident in the late summer of 2001.

A
Chaotic Start to a New Century 1477 

 9/11—a new day of infamy At 8:45 a.m. on September 11, 2001, the continental United States was attacked for the first time since 1814 when a passenger airliner that had been hijacked by Islamist terrorists slammed into the north tower of the World Trade Center in New York City. Eighteen minutes later, a second hijacked jumbo jet crashed into the south tower. The twin towers, 110 stories tall and filled with 50,000 workers, burned fiercely, the infernos forcing hundreds of desperate people to jump to their deaths as t­housands more on the floors below the points of impact struggled to ­evacuate. The steel structures quickly collapsed from the intense heat, ­destroying ­surrounding buildings and killing nearly 3,000 people, including more than 400 firefighters, police officers, and emergency responders. The southern end of ­Manhattan—“ground zero”—became a hellish scene of twisted steel, ­suffocating smoke, wailing sirens, and panicked people. While the catastrophic drama in New York City was unfolding, a third hijacked plane crashed into the Pentagon in Washington, D.C. A fourth airliner,

 September 11th Smoke pours out of the north tower of the World Trade Center as the south tower bursts into flames after being struck by a second hijacked airplane. Both iconic buildings would collapse within an hour.

 1478  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 probably headed for the White House, missed its mark when the ­passengers—​ ­who had heard reports of the earlier hijackings via their cell p ­ hones—​­assaulted the hijackers to prevent the plane from being used as a weapon. During the struggle, the plane went out of control and plummeted into the ground near Shanksville, Pennsylvania, killing all aboard. Within hours of the hijackings, the nineteen dead terrorists were i­ dentified as members of al Qaeda ­(Arabic for “the Base”), a ­well-​­financed network of Islamic extremists led by a wealthy Saudi renegade, Osama bin Laden. Years before, bin Laden had declared jihad (holy war) on the United States, Israel, and the Saudi monarchy in his effort to create a single Islamist ­caliphate (global empire). He used remote bases in Sudan and ­war-​­torn Afghanistan as training centers for jihadist fighters. Collaborating with bin Laden’s terrorist network was Afghanistan’s ruling Taliban, a coalition of ultraconservative Islamists who provided bin Laden a safe haven.

The “War on Terror”
 The 9/11 assault on the United States, like the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941, changed the course of modern life. People were initially paralyzed by grief, fear, and anger. The U.S. economy, already in decline, went into free fall. President Bush was thrust into the role of commander in chief of a nation eager for vengeance. Bush said that he was going to launch a global war on terror “to answer these attacks and rid the world of evil.” He warned other nations that “either you are with us or you are with the terrorists.” A wave of patriotic fervor rolled across the nation. People formed long lines to donate blood, and many signed up for military service. Bush demanded that Afghanistan’s Taliban government surrender the al Qaeda terrorists or risk military attack. The Taliban refused, and on ­October 7, 2001, the United States and its allies launched Operation Enduring ­Freedom. After American and British cruise missiles and bombers destroyed Afghan ­military installations and al Qaeda training camps, ground troops from the United States and some of its NATO allies routed Taliban forces. On ­December 9, the Taliban regime collapsed. The war in Afghanistan then ­transitioned into a h ­ igh-​­stakes manhunt for the elusive Osama bin Laden, who had escaped into the mountains of Pakistan.

 fighting terror at home

 While the military campaign continued in Afghanistan, officials in Washington worried that terrorists might attack the United States with biological, chemical, or even nuclear weapons.

A
Chaotic Start to a New Century 1479 

 War fever President George W. Bush addresses members of the Special Forces in July 2002 as part of an appeal to Congress to increase defense spending after the September 11 terrorist attacks.

 To address the threat and to help restore public confidence, President Bush, without Congressional approval, established the Office of Homeland Security and gave it sweeping authority to spy on Americans. Another new federal agency, the Transportation Security Administration, assumed responsibility for screening airline passengers for weapons and bombs. At the same time, Bush and a supportive Congress created the USA Patriot Act, which gave government agencies the right to eavesdrop on confidential conversations between prison inmates and their lawyers and permitted suspected terrorists to be tried in secret military courts. Civil liberties groups voiced grave concerns that the measures jeopardized constitutional rights and protections, but most people supported these extraordinary steps. What the public did not know was that Vice President Dick Cheney, Secretary of Defense Donald Rumsfeld, and other s­o-​­called neoconservatives (“neocons”) in the departments of state and defense had convinced the president to authorize the use of torture (“enhanced interrogation techniques”) in the CIA’s and FBI’s treatment of captured terrorist suspects. Such tactics violated international law and compromised the human rights ideals that had always been America’s greatest strength. When asked about such activities, the shadowy Cheney scoffed that America sometimes had to work “the dark side”: “We’ve got to spend time in the shadows in the intelligence world. . . .”

 1480  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 The Taliban A young woman shows her face in public for the first time in five years after Northern Alliance troops capture Kabul, the capital of Afghanistan, in November 2001. The strict sharia law enforced by the Taliban required that women be covered from head to foot.

 the bush doctrine

 In the fall of 2002, President Bush unveiled a dramatic new national security policy. The Bush Doctrine said that the growing menace posed by “shadowy networks” of terrorist groups and unstable rogue nations with “weapons of mass destruction” (WMDs) required the United States at times to use preemptive military action. “If we wait for threats to fully materialize,” or wait for allies to join America, he explained, “we will have waited too long. In the world we have entered, the only path to safety is the path of action. And this nation will act.” The dangerously sweeping Bush Doctrine promised to “extend the benefits of freedom across the globe . . . ​for all peoples everywhere,” without reference to the potential human and financial cost of such an ­open-​­ended commitment.

 the second iraq war

 During 2002 and 2003, Iraq emerged as the focus of the Bush administration’s policy of “preemptive” military action. Three of the president’s most influential advisers, all neocons, Vice President Cheney, Secretary of Defense Rumsfeld, and Deputy Defense Secretary Paul Wolfowitz, urged the president to use U.S. power to reshape the world in the American mold. This included sponsoring “regime change” in nations lacking “political and economic freedom” in order to create a new world order “friendly to our security, our prosperity, and our principles.” They convinced Bush that

A
Chaotic Start to a New Century 1481 

 the dictatorial regime of Saddam Hussein and his loyal Sunni faction of Muslims, who lorded over the nation’s Shiite majority and the ethnic Kurds in the north, represented a “grave and gathering danger” because of its supposed possession of biological and chemical weapons of mass ­destruction. Some in ­Congress urged caution. Republican Senator Chuck Hagel of Nebraska, a ­Vietnam ­veteran, warned that “many of those who want to rush this country into war and think it would be so quick and easy don’t know anything about war.” The White House responded: “Trust us.” On March 17, 2003, Bush issued Hussein an ultimatum: he and his sons must leave Iraq within f­ orty-​­eight hours or face a United S­ tates–​­led invasion. Hussein refused. Two days later, on March 19, American and British forces (the “coalition of the willing”) attacked. France and Germany refused to participate in what they viewed as unnecessary American aggression. “Operation Iraqi Freedom,” according to Bush and his advisers, would quickly topple Hussein with overwhelming military force and then usher in a new era of U.S.-style democracy in Iraq. The Second Iraq War began with a massive bombing campaign, followed by a ­fast-​­moving invasion from bases in Kuwait. Some 250,000 American ­soldiers, sailors, and marines were joined by 50,000 British troops. On April 9, after three weeks of intense fighting amid sweltering heat and blinding sandstorms, U.S. forces captured Baghdad, the capital of Iraq. Saddam Hussein’s regime and his inept, demoralized army collapsed a week later. The ­six-​­week war came at a cost of fewer than 200 combat deaths among the 300,000 allied troops. More than 2,000 Iraqi soldiers were killed; civilian casualties numbered in the tens of thousands. President Bush staged a celebration on a U.S. aircraft carrier at which he announced victory under a massive banner proclaiming “mission accomplished.” But he spoke too soon; the ­initial military triumph carried with it the seeds of deception and disaster, for no weapons of mass destruction were to be found in Iraq. Secretary of State Colin Powell later admitted that he had been misled about the issue. Bush said that the absence of WMDs in Iraq left him with a “sickening feeling,” for he knew that his primary justification for the war had evaporated.

 rebuilding iraq

 It proved far easier to win the brief war than to rebuild Iraq in America’s image. Unprepared U.S. officials faced the daunting task of installing a democratic government in a nation fractured by religious feuds and ethnic tensions made worse by the breakdown in law and order caused by the allied invasion. The successful invasion triggered a vicious civil war in Iraq and the disintegration of law and order. Looting and violence engulfed the ­war-​­torn country, large parts of which fell under the control of

 1482  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 warlords and criminal gangs. In the process, the entire Middle East, already volatile, was further destabilized. Within weeks, vengeful Islamic radicals streamed into the crippled nation to wage a merciless campaign of terror, sabotage, and suicide bombings against the U.S. forces. Bush’s macho reaction to the i­nsurgency—“Bring ’em on!”— revealed how uninformed he was about the f­ast-​­deteriorating situation. The leader of the new Iraqi government, Prime Minister N ­ ourial-​­Maliki, quickly imposed his own authoritarian, S­ hiite-​­dominated regime which discriminated against the Sunnis, the Kurds, and other ethnic and religious minorities. Defense Secretary Rumsfeld greatly underestimated the difficulty and expense of occupying, pacifying, and reconstructing postwar Iraq. By the fall of 2003, Bush admitted that substantial numbers of American troops (around 150,000) would have to remain in Iraq much longer than anticipated. He also said that rebuilding Iraq would take years and cost almost a trillion dollars. Investigative reporter James Fallows concluded that the U.S. “occupation in Iraq is a debacle not because the government did no planning but because a vast amount of expert planning was willfully ignored by the people in charge.” Victory on the battlefields of Iraq did not bring victory in the “war on terrorism.” Militant Islamist groups remained a global threat. Americans grew more and more dismayed as the number of casualties and the expense of the military occupation in Iraq soared. The nation became more alienated when journalists revealed graphic pictures of U.S. soldiers abusing and torturing Arab detainees in the Abu Ghraib prison near Baghdad. “When you lose the moral high ground,” an army general sadly observed, “you lose it all.” President Bush urged Americans to “stay the course,” insisting that a democratic Iraq would bring stability to the Middle East and thereby blunt the momentum of Islamic terrorism. Yet even though Saddam Hussein was captured in December 2003 and later hanged, Iraq seemed less secure than ever. By the beginning of 2004, some 1,000 Americans had died in the conflict, and more than 10,000 had been wounded. The ethnic and religious tensions only worsened as violent Sunni jihadists allied with al Qaeda to undermine the new Iraqi government and assault U.S. forces. The U.S. effort in Iraq was the wrong war in the wrong place fought in the wrong way. It forced Bush to spend government funds at a rate faster than any president since Lyndon Johnson, and it distracted attention from the revival of the Taliban and other terrorist groups in Afghanistan. “We thank God for appeasing us with the [U.S.] dilemmas in Iraq and Afghanistan,” snickered bin Laden’s deputy, Ayman a­ l-​­Zawahiri. Journalist Roger Cohen distilled perhaps the most important lesson from the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan when

A
Chaotic Start to a New Century 1483 

 Freedom for whom? The American torture of Iraqis in Abu Ghraib prison only exacerbated the anger and humiliation that Iraqis experienced since the First Gulf War. In response to America’s incessant promises of peace and autonomy, a Baghdad mural fires back: “That Freedom for B[u]sh.”

 he said that the American ideal of democracy “can still resonate” with people around the world, but U.S. leaders “must embody it rather than impose it.”

 the election of 2004

 Growing public concern about Iraq complicated George W. Bush’s campaign for a second presidential term in 2004. The Democratic nominee, Senator John Kerry of Massachusetts, condemned Bush for misleading the nation about weapons of mass destruction and for his slipshod handling of the reconstruction of postwar Iraq. Kerry also highlighted the Bush administration’s record budget deficits. Bush countered that the tortuous efforts to create a democratic government in Iraq would enhance America’s ­long-​­term security. On Election Day, November 2, 2004, exit polls suggested a Kerry ­victory, but in the end the election hinged on the crucial swing state of Ohio. No ­Republican had ever lost Ohio and won the presidency. Despite early returns indicating a Kerry victory in Ohio, late returns tipped the ­balance toward Bush, even as rumors of electoral “irregularities” began to circulate.

 1484  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

THE ELECTION OF 2004 WA OR

 CA

MT ID

 NV

 ND

WY UT

 AZ

 CO

 MN

 SD

 IA

NE KS OK

NM TX

 HI

 AK

■


 NH 4 VT 3 WI

 MI

 NY

PA OH 20 WV VA MO 5 13 KY 8 NC TN 11 AR SC MS AL GA LA FL IL

 IN

ME MA 12 RI 4 CT 7 NJ 15 DE 3 MD 10 DC 3

Electoral Vote


Popular Vote


George W. Bush
(Republican)




60,700,000


John Kerry
(Democrat)




57,400,000


 How did the war in Iraq polarize American politics? did the election of 2004 give Republicans a mandate for change?

 WWN66

■ Figure
 In what ways M32_2

 First proof

 ­ evertheless, Kerry conceded the election. “The outcome,” he stressed, N “should be decided by ­voters, not a protracted legal battle.” By narrowly winning Ohio, Bush captured 286 electoral votes to ­Kerry’s 251. Yet in some respects, the election was not so close. Bush received 3.5 ­million more votes nationwide than Kerry, and Republicans increased their majorities in both houses of Congress. A reelected Bush pledged to bring democracy and stability to Iraq, trim the federal deficit, pass a major energy bill, create more jobs, and “privatize” Social Security funds by investing them in the stock m ­ arket. “I earned capital in the campaign, political capital, and now I intend to spend it,” he told reporters.

Second-Term Blues
 George Bush’s second term was beset by thorny political problems, a sluggish economy, and continuing turmoil in Iraq. In 2005, he pushed through Congress an energy bill and a Central American Free Trade Act. But his effort to

Second-Term Blues  1485


 privatize Social Security retirement accounts by enabling individuals to invest their accumulated pension dollars themselves went nowhere, and soaring budget deficits made many fiscal conservatives feel betrayed by the supposedly “conservative” Bush. The editors of the Economist, an influential conservative newsmagazine, declared that Bush had become “the least popular ­re-​­elected president since Richard Nixon.”

 hurricane katrina

 In 2005, President Bush’s eroding public support suffered another blow. In late August, a killer hurricane named Katrina slammed into the Gulf coast, devastating large areas of Alabama, Mississippi, and Louisiana. Katrina left more than 1,000 dead and millions homeless and hopeless, especially in New Orleans. Local officials and the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) were caught unprepared as the catastrophe unfolded, and confusion and incompetence abounded. In the face of blistering criticism, Bush accepted responsibility for the balky federal response and accepted the resignation of the FEMA director. Rebuilding the Gulf coast would take a long time and a lot of money. The backlash over the federal response to Katrina contributed to a devastating defeat for Republicans in the November 2006 congressional ­

 The aftermath of Hurricane Katrina Two men use boards to paddle through high water in ­flood-​­devastated New Orleans.

 1486  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 e­lections. The Democrats capitalized on widespread public disapproval of the Bush administration to win control of the House of Representatives, the ­Senate, and a majority of governorships and state legislatures. Former Texas Republican congressman Dick Armey said that “the Republican Revolution of 1994 officially ended” with the 2006 election. The transformational election also included a significant milestone: Californian Nancy Pelosi, the leader of the Democrats in the House of Representatives, became the ­highest-​­ranking woman in the history of the U.S. Congress upon her election as House Speaker in January 2007. Nancy Pelosi The first female Speaker of the House at a news conference on Capitol Hill.

 the “surge” in iraq

George
W.
Bush bore the brunt of p ­ublic indignation over the ­bungled federal response to the Katrina d ­ isaster and the costs and casualties of the war in Iraq. Senator Chuck Hagel, a Nebraska Republican, declared in 2005 that “we’re losing in Iraq.” Throughout the fall of 2006, the violence in Iraq spiraled upward. Bush eventually responded to declining public and political support for the Iraq War by ­creating the Iraq Study Group, a bipartisan task force appointed by the p ­ resident. It surprised the president by issuing a report recommending the withdrawal of combat forces from a “grave and ­deteriorating Iraq” by the spring of 2008. Bush disagreed with those who urged a phased withdrawal. On January 10, 2007, he announced that he was sending a “surge” of 20,000 (eventually 30,000) more troops to Iraq, bringing the total to almost 170,000. From a military perspective, the “surge” succeeded. By the fall of 2008, violence in Iraq had declined dramatically, and the Iraqi government had grown in stature and confidence. The U.S. general who masterminded the increase in troops admitted that the gains were “fragile and reversible,” however, and as the number of U.S. combat deaths in Iraq passed 4,000, Bush acknowledged that the conflict was “longer and harder and more costly than we anticipated.” By 2008, more than 60 percent of Americans said that the war had been a mistake. 
Second-Term Blues  1487


 economic shock

 After the intense but brief 2001 recession, the boom/bust capitalist economy had begun another period of prolonged ­expansion. Between 1997 and 2006, home prices in the United States, ­especially in the ­fast-​­growing sunbelt states, rose 85 percent, leading to a frenzy of irresponsible mortgage ­lending—​­and a ­debt-​­financed consumer spending spree. Tens of millions of people bought houses they could not afford, refinanced their mortgages, or tapped h ­ ome-​­equity loans to make discretionary purchases. The irrational confidence in soaring housing prices also led government regulatory agencies and mortgage lenders to ease credit restrictions so that unqualified people could buy homes without making any down payment. The housing bubble burst in 2007, when home values and sales began a sharp decline. The loss of trillions of dollars in home values set off a seismic shock across the economy, as record numbers of borrowers defaulted on their mortgage payments. Foreclosures and bankruptcies soared, and banks lost billions, first on the shaky mortgages, then on most other categories of overleveraged debt: credit cards, car loans, student loans, and commercial m ­ ortgage-​­backed securities. The sudden contraction of corporate spending and consumer purchases pushed the economy into a recession in 2008. Some of the nation’s most prestigious banks, investment firms, and insurance companies went belly up. The price of food and gasoline spiked, and unemployment soared. What had begun as a sharp decline in home prices became a global economic meltdown. The crisis demanded decisive action. On October 3, 2008, President Bush signed into law the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP), which called for the Treasury Department to spend $700 billion to keep big banks and other large financial institutions afloat. Yet the passage of the bill did little to restore confidence in the economy as a whole. In early October, stock markets around the world began to crash with the onset of what came to be called the Great Recession, which technically lasted from December 2007 to January 2009 and forced almost 9 million people out of work. Its effects would linger, however, and the economic recovery that began in June 2009 would be the weakest since the end of the Second World War. The Great Recession had powerful political effects. Bush, who as governor of Texas had described himself as “a uniter, not a divider,” became one of the least popular and most divisive presidents in American history. Just 29 percent of voters “approved” of his leadership, and more than 80 percent said that the nation was headed in the “wrong direction.” Kevin Phillips, a prominent Republican strategist, deemed Bush “perhaps the least competent president in modern history.” Bush’s failed presidency

 1488  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century A ­ merica 1993–Present

 Rio Vista, California With an $816,000 deficit, this northern California city filed for bankruptcy and pulled the plug on its massive, 750-home housing development in November 2008. Here, model homes stand eerily in a blank landscape of sidewalks and ­cul-​­de-​­sacs.

 had weakened the Republican party, strained the nation’s military, eroded ­American prestige, and created the largest budget deficits in history by cutting taxes while increasing spending. “I inherited a recession, and I’m ending on a recession,” Bush admitted at one of his last press conferences.

A
Historic New Presidency  George Bush’s unpopularity excited Democrats about regaining the White House in 2008. The early f­ront-​­runner for the nomination was New York ­senator Hillary Rodham Clinton, the spouse of ­ex-​­president Bill Clinton. Like her husband, she displayed an impressive command of policy issues and ­mobilized a ­well-​­funded campaign team. And, as the first woman with a ­serious chance of gaining the presidency, she had widespread support among voters eager for female leadership. In the end, however, an overconfident Clinton was upset in the D ­ emocratic primaries and caucuses by Barack Obama of Illinois, a l­ittle-​­known ­first-​­term senator. Young, handsome, and intelligent, a vibrant mixture of i­dealism and

A
Historic New Presidency 1489 

 pragmatism, coolness and passion, Obama was an inspiring speaker who attracted huge crowds by promising a “politics of hope.” He mounted an innovative ­Internet-​­based campaign directed at grassroots voters, donors, and volunteers. In early June 2008, he gained enough delegates to secure the ­nomination, with Senator Joseph Biden of Delaware as his running mate. Obama was the first African Amer- The Clinton campaign Democratic ican presidential nominee of either presidential candidate Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton speaks at a rally in Fort party, the gifted biracial son of a white Worth, Texas. mother from Kansas and a black father from Kenya who left the household and returned to Africa when Barack was a toddler. Obama eventually graduated from Columbia University before earning a law degree from Harvard. The ­forty-​­seven-​­year-​­old senator presented himself as a deal maker who could inspire, unite, and forge bipartisan collaborations. Candidate Obama radiated poise, confidence, and energy. He told an aide that he didn’t “need to be president. It turns out that being Barack Obama is a pretty good gig in and of itself.” He and his strategists were able to turn his vitality and political inexperience into strengths at a time when voter disgust with politics was widespread. By contrast, his Republican opponent, s­ eventy-​­two-​­year-​­old Arizona senator John McCain, was the oldest presidential candidate in history. As a ­twenty-​ five-​­ ­ year veteran of Congress and a leading senator, McCain had developed a reputation as a bipartisan “­ maverick” willing to work with Democrats to achieve key legislative goals. On November 4, 2008, Barack Obama made history by becoming the first person of color to be elected presi- Barack Obama The ­president-​­elect and his family wave to supporters in dent. He won the popular vote by 53 per- Chicago’s Grant Park. cent to 46 percent, and the e­lectoral

 1490  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

THE ELECTION OF 2008 WA OR

 CA

MT ID

 NV

 ND

WY UT

 AZ

 CO

SD NE
(+1 Dem.) 
KS OK

NM TX

 HI

 AK

MN IA

 NH 4 VT 3 WI

 MI

 NY

PA OH 20 WV VA MO 5 13 KY 8 NC TN 11 AR SC MS AL GA LA FL IL

 IN

ME MA 12 RI 4 CT 7 NJ 15 DE 3 MD 10 DC 3

Electoral Vote


Popular Vote


Barack Obama
(Democrat)




69,500,000


 John McCain (Republican)



59,900,000


 How did the economic crisis affect the outcome of the election? similarities and differences between the map of the 2004 election First proof and the map of the 2008 election?

■


 WWN64

■Figure
What
 are the M32_3

 college 365 to 173. Obama also helped the Democrats win solid majorities in both houses of Congress. Within days of his victory, Obama adopted a bipartisan approach in s­ electing his new cabinet members. He appointed Hillary Clinton secretary of state, retained Republican Robert Gates as secretary of defense, selected retired general James Jones, who had campaigned for McCain, as his national s­ecurity adviser, and appointed Eric Holder as the nation’s first African A ­ merican attorney general. But picking a bipartisan cabinet proved easier than forging a bipartisan presidency.

 obama’s first term

 President Obama and his administration inherited two unpopular wars and the worst economic situation in eighty years. His most pressing challenge was to keep the Great Recession from becoming a prolonged depression. Unemployment in early 2009 had passed 8 percent and was still rising. The financial sector remained paralyzed, and public confidence had plummeted.

A
Historic New Presidency 1491 

 One visible sign of the Great Recession’s effects was the sharp decline in Mexicans emigrating to the United States. In 2000, some 700,000 Mexicans had crossed the Rio Grande, but by 2010, the number had dropped to less than 150,000, as it became easier for people to improve their quality of life in Mexico and harder to do so in the United States. By 2014, some experts believed that more Mexicans were leaving the U.S. than entering it. To enable banks to start lending again, the new administration continued the TARP program that provided massive government bailouts to the largest banks and financial institutions. The bailouts were attacked by both the Left and the Right as deeply unfair to most struggling Americans. Treasury secretary Timothy Geithner later explained, “We had to do whatever we could to help people feel their money was safe in the [banking] system, even if it made us unpopular.” Had they not saved the big banks, Obama and Geithner argued, the economy would have crashed. Preserving the banking system did not create many jobs, however. To do so, in ­mid-​­February 2009, Congress passed, and Obama signed, an $832 billion ­economic-​­stimulus bill called the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act. The bill included cash distributions to states for construction projects to renew the nation’s infrastructure (roads, bridges, levees, government buildings, and the electricity grid), money for ­renewable-​­energy systems, and $212 billion in tax reductions for individuals and businesses, as well as funds for food stamps and unemployment benefits. It was the largest government infusion of cash into the economy in history. In the end, however, it was not enough to generate a robust economic recovery, but Obama’s actions did save the ­nation—​­and the world ­economy—​­from a financial meltdown.

 ­health care reform The economic crisis merited Barack Obama’s

 full attention, but he chose as his top legislative priority a controversial federal ­health insurance program. From his first day in office, Obama stressed his intention to reform a ­health care system that was “bankrupting families, bankrupting businesses, and bankrupting our government at the state and ­federal level.” The United States, home to the world’s costliest health system, was the only rich nation without a national ­health care program. Since 1970, the proportion of uninsured people had been steadily rising along with ­health care costs. In 2010, roughly 50 million Americans (16 percent of the population), most of them poor, young, or people of color, had no health insurance. The president’s goal in creating the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (ACA), which Republican critics labeled “Obamacare,” was to make health insurance more affordable and make health care accessible for ­everyone. The $940 billion law, proposed in 2009 and debated for a year, ­centered on the

 1492  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century A ­ merica 1993–Present

 s­ o-​­called individual mandate, which required uninsured adults to purchase an approved private insurance policy made available through ­state-​­run exchanges (websites where people could shop for insurance) or pay a tax penalty. L ­ ower-​ ­income Americans could receive federal subsidies to help pay for their coverage, and insurance companies could no longer deny coverage to people with preexisting illnesses. Employers who did not offer health insurance would have to pay higher taxes, and drug companies and manufacturers of medical devices would have to pay annual government fees. Everyone, but especially the wealthy, would pay higher Medicare payroll taxes to help fund the changes. The individual mandate was designed to ensure that all Americans had health insurance so as to reduce the skyrocketing costs of hospitals providing “charity care” for the uninsured. The ACA did not change the American tradition of e­ mployment-​­based health insurance provided by private companies. But the idea of forcing people to buy health insurance flew in the face of such ideals as individual freedom and personal responsibility. Critics questioned not only the individual mandate but the administration’s projections that the program would reduce federal expenditures over the long haul. Republicans mobilized to defeat the ACA. “If we’re able to stop Obama on this it will be his Waterloo. It will break him,” predicted South Carolina senator Jim DeMint. Despite heated opposition, however, the ACA passed with narrow ­party-​­line majorities in both houses of Congress. Obama signed it into law on March 23, 2010. Its complex provisions, to be implemented over a f­ our-​ ­year period, would bring health insurance to 32 million people, half of whom would be covered by expanded Medicaid and the other half by the individual mandate. In its scope and goals, the ACA was a landmark in the history of health and social w ­ elfare—​­as well as the expansion of the federal government.

 obamacare and the courts

 No sooner had President Obama pushed his h ­ ealth care plan through Congress than Republicans began challenging its constitutionality. On June 28, 2012, in the case of National Federation of Independent Business v. Sebelius, the Supreme Court surprised observers by ruling 5–4 that most of the new law was constitutional. Even more surprising was that the chief justice, John G. Roberts, a philosophical conservative who had never before voted with the four “liberal” justices on the Court, cast the deciding vote. Roberts upheld the ACA’s individual mandate that required people to buy private health insurance or pay a tax, arguing that it was within Congress’s power to impose taxes as outlined in Article 1 of the Constitution. Many conservatives, including the four dissenting justices, felt betrayed. The verdict led the New York Times to predict that the ruling “may secure Obama’s place in history.”

A
Historic New Presidency 1493 

 regulating wall street

 The near collapse of the nation’s ­ nancial system beginning in 2008 prompted calls for overhauling the ­financial fi regulatory system. On July 21, 2010, Obama signed the Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, also called the ­Dodd-​­Frank bill after its two congressional sponsors. It was the most comprehensive reform of the financial system since the New Deal in the thirties. The 2,319-page law required ­government agencies to exercise greater oversight over complex new financial transactions and protected consumers from unfair practices in loans and credit cards by establishing a new consumer ­financial-​­protection agency. President Obama predicted that the bill, despite its complexity, would “lift our economy,” give “certainty to everybody” about the technical rules g­ overning banking, and end “­tax-​­funded ­bailouts—​­period.” By 2010, however, the ­economy had not been “lifted” and many bankers remained confused about the new rules ­regulating the financial industry.

Foreign Affairs
 President Obama had more success in dealing with foreign affairs than in reviving the American economy. What journalists came to call the Obama Doctrine was very much like the Nixon Doctrine (1970), stressing that the United States could not continue to be the world’s principal policeman. Yet the fate of America’s economy and security was entangled more than ever with the fate of an unstable and often violent world.

 the obama doctrine

 The loosely defined Obama Doctrine grew out of efforts to end the expensive wars in Iraq and ­Afghanistan. In essence, the president wanted to replace confrontation and military intervention with a stance of cooperation and negotiation. The president told administration officials that his doctrine could be summed up in the phrase, “Don’t do stupid stuff.” On February 27, 2009, Obama announced that all 142,000 U.S. troops would be withdrawn from Iraq by the end of 2011, as the Iraqi government and the Bush administration had agreed in 2008. True to his word, the last U.S. combat troops left Iraq in December 2011. Their departure marked the end of a bitterly divisive war that had raged for nearly nine years, killed more than 110,000 Iraqis, and left the nation shattered and unstable, despite Obama’s upbeat claim that the departing U.S. forces were “leaving behind a sovereign, stable, and ­self-​­reliant Iraq with a representative government.” The war had cost more than 4,500 American lives, 30,000 wounded (many grievously so), and $2 trillion. Perhaps the greatest embarrassment was that

 1494  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century A ­ merica 1993–Present

 the Iraqi government the United States left behind was inept and not even friendly to American interests. The long and chaotic war was an expensive mistake and a prolonged distraction for the government, the military, and the nation. As it turned out, there were no weapons of mass destruction, nor was there a direct link between the al Qaeda terrorists and Saddam Hussein. Al Qaeda, in fact, did not arrive in Iraq until after the American invasion. “The first Iraq war, in which I led a tank platoon, was necessary,” said John Nagel, a retired army officer. “This one was not.” American efforts at nation building had failed. In June 2014, a j­ournalist said that “it was time to admit that we cannot force a pluralistic society” on a ­dysfunctional Iraq torn by sectarian and ethnic violence into three rival regional states: one Shiite, one Sunni (“governed” by jihadists), and one ­Kurdish. Even Leon Panetta, who served as CIA director and secretary of defense under Obama, scolded the president for being so eager to withdraw U.S. forces that he failed to create the circumstances “that would preserve our influence and interests” in Iraq. Obama’s hopes that the United States could get out of fighting wars in the Middle East and that the Iraqis could sustain a

 Home from Iraq U.S. troops returned from Iraq to few celebrations.

A
Historic New Presidency 1495 

 stable and secure government in the face of terrorist incursions and sectarian fighting proved to be fantasies. Iraq’s woeful s­ elf-​­government and the fractious nation’s constant sectarian strife and disorder required continued infusions of U.S. military assistance, daily bombing raids, and massive economic aid.

 “surge” in afghanistan

 At the same time that President Obama was ending U.S. military involvement in Iraq, he dispatched 21,000 additional troops to Afghanistan in what was called a “surge.” While doing so, however, he narrowed the focus of the U.S. mission to suppressing terrorists rather than transforming ­strife-​­torn Afghanistan into a stable capitalist democracy. The surge worked. By the summer of 2011, Obama announced that the “tide of war was receding” and that the United States had largely achieved its goals in Afghanistan, setting in motion a substantial withdrawal of forces that lasted until 2014. Obama stressed that the Afghans must determine their ­country’s future stability. “We will not try to make Afghanistan a perfect place,” he said. “We will not police its streets or patrol its mountains indefinitely. That is the responsibility of the Afghan government.” As the troops came home, Americans quickly lost interest in what Obama had earlier called the “good war” in Afghanistan. In April 2014, despite threats by the Taliban to kill voters, Afghans turned out in huge numbers to choose a new president to lead them into the ­post-​­American era. But it was an expensive outcome for America’s longest war. In the thirteen years since its 2001 invasion of Afghanistan, America had spent more than a trillion dollars there and lost 2,300 servicemen.

 the death of osama bin laden

 The crowning ­achievement of President Obama’s ­anti-​­terrorism efforts was the discovery, at long last, of Osama bin Laden’s hideout. Ever since the attacks of 9/11, bin Laden had eluded an intensive manhunt. In August 2010, however, U.S. intelligence analysts discovered his sanctuary in a walled residential compound outside of Abbottabad, Pakistan. On May 1, 2011, Obama authorized a daring night raid by a U.S. Navy SEAL team transported by helicopters from Afghanistan. After a brief firefight, the SEALs killed bin Laden. His death was a watershed moment, but it did not spell the end of Islamist terrorism.

 the “arab awakening”

 In late 2010 and early 2011, spontaneous democratic uprisings erupted throughout much of the Arab world as l­ong-​ ­oppressed peoples rose up against authoritarian regimes. Corrupt tyrants were forced out of power by a new generation of young activists inspired by ­democratic ideals and connected by social media on the Internet. What was soon dubbed

 1496  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

Arab Awakening Thousands of
 protesters converge in Cairo’s Tahrir Square to call for an end to Mubarak’s rule.

 libya ousts gaddafi

 “the Arab Awakening” sent waves of youthful unrest across Tunisia, ­Algeria, Bahrain, Jordan, Morocco, Egypt, Oman, Yemen, Libya, Saudi Arabia, and Syria during what came to be called the Arab Spring of 2011. Dictators were toppled while democracy was embraced as the remarkable uprisings heralded a new era in the history of the Middle East. Yet the heroic days of revolutionary idealism soon gave way to the harsh reality that the rebels were so busy fighting among each other that they could not forge unified political alternatives. Building new democratic governments proved much harder than expected. The grassroots revolutionary movements in most Arab nations stumbled and stalled by 2014. Egypt reverted to an authoritarianism even harsher than that in place before the Arab Spring. Libya lapsed into chaos and Yemen exploded in civil war.

The p
 ­ro-​­ democracy turmoil in North Africa engulfed ­ oil-​­ rich Libya, long governed by the mercurial dictator Colonel Muammar Gaddafi, the Arab world’s most violent despot. ­Anti-​ ­government demonstrations began on February 15, 2011, prompting Gaddafi to order L ­ ibyan soldiers and mercenaries (paid foreign soldiers) to suppress the ­rebellious “rats.” By the end of February, what began as a peaceful p ­ ro-​ ­democratic uprising had turned into a ­full-​­scale civil war that provided the first real test of the Obama Doctrine. True to his word, the president refused to act alone in helping the L ­ ibyan rebels (critics called it “leading from behind.”). Instead, he encouraged ­European allies to take the lead. On March 19, France and Great Britain, with American support, launched a bombing campaign against Gaddafi’s ­military strongholds. In late August, rebel forces captured the capital of Tripoli, ­scattering Gaddafi’s government and marking the end of his ­forty-​­two-​­year dictatorship. On October 20, rebel fighters captured and killed Gaddafi. But the rebel militias that removed Gaddafi soon started shooting at each other, and stability remained elusive by the end of 2014.

A
Historic New Presidency 1497 

 the cuban thaw

 At the end of 2014, President Obama surprised the world by announcing that the United States and Cuba were going to restore normal relations after more than fifty years of bitter hostility. As a first step, Obama relaxed restrictions on American tourists visiting Cuba. Six months later, in mid-2015, the two nations took a much more substantial step toward normalization when they reestablished embassies in each other’s capital cities. The bold move was controversial, however. The powerful Cuban community in south Florida fiercely criticized Obama’s decision, and Congressional Republicans threatened to block the appointment of a U.S. ambassador to Cuba because of its communist government. But the president persisted in his efforts, insisting that isolating Cuba had not worked. “Americans and Cubans alike are ready to move forward,” he said in July 2015. “I believe it’s time for Congress to do the same.”

Polarized Politics
 Barack Obama had campaigned in 2008 on the promise of bringing ­dramatic change to the federal government in a way that would reduce the p ­ artisan ­warfare between the two national parties. By the end of his first year in office, however, a Gallup poll found that he had become the most polarizing ­president in modern history. In part, the widening partisan divide resulted from ­Obama’s aloof presidential style. Like Jimmy Carter, he does not like to lobby and ­horse-​­trade his way to legislative approval. Even Democrats c­ riticized his growing “aloofness” from the messy business of working with legislators. Yet the ­standoff with Congress was not solely his fault. His ­Republican o ­ pponents had no interest in negotiating with him, and American political culture had become so polarized that it resembled two separate nations. Each party had its own ­cable-​­news station and rabidly partisan commentators, its own ­newspapers, its own think tanks, and its own billionaire donors. Governing, Obama quickly discovered, is far more difficult than campaigning.

 the tea party

 No sooner was Barack Obama sworn in than ­­anti-​ ­government conservatives mobilized against him and the “­tax-​­and-​­spend” ­liberalism he represented in their eyes. In January 2009, a New York stock trader named Graham Makohoniuk sent an e­ -​­mail message urging people to send tea bags to their congressional representatives to symbolize the ­Boston Tea Party of 1773, when American colonists protested against British tax policies. Within a year or so, the tax revolt had become a national Tea Party ­movement, with groups in all fifty states. The Tea Party is not so much a ­cohesive political organization as it is a mood, an attitude, and an i­deology,

 1498  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 The Tea Party movement Tea Party supporters gather outside the New Hampshire Statehouse for a tax day rally.

 a diverse collection of ­self-​­described “disaffected,” “angry,” and “very conservative” ­activists, mostly white, male, married, ­middle-​­class Republicans over f­ orty-​­five. To the ­anti-​­tax rebels, the federal bailouts ordered by Presidents Bush and Obama in the wake of the 2008 economic meltdown were a form of “crony ­capitalism” whereby the “elite” rewarded the big companies that had funded their campaigns. Tea Party members demanded a radically smaller f­ederal ­government (although most of them supported Social Security and M ­ edicare, the two most expensive federal social programs). Democrats, including Obama, initially dismissed the Tea Party as a fringe group, but the 2010 ­election results proved them wrong. Democratic House and ­Senate candidates (as well as moderate Republicans), including many ­long-​­serving leaders, were defeated in droves when conservative Republicans, many of them aligned with the Tea Party, gained ­sixty-​­three seats to recapture control of the House of ­Representatives. They won a near majority in the Senate as well. It was the most lopsided ­midterm election since 1938. Thereafter, the bickering between both parties prevented ­meaningful action on the languishing economy, chronic joblessness, and the runaway ­federal budget deficit. Neither party wanted to ­negotiate or compromise.

A
Historic New Presidency 1499 

 occupy wall street

The
 emergence of the Tea Party was mirrored on the left by the Occupy Wall Street (OWS) movement, mobilized in the fall of 2011 when a call went out over the Internet to “Occupy Wall Street. Bring tent.” Dozens, then ­hundreds, then thousands of people, many of them unemployed young adults, converged on Zuccotti Park in lower Manhattan. They formed tent villages and gathered to “occupy” Wall Street, protesting the “tyrannical” power of major banks and investment companies. The protesters described themselves as the voice of the 99 percent of ­Americans who were being victimized by the 1 ­percent—​­the wealthiest and most politically connected Amer- Occupy Wall Street The ­Manhattan-​ ­born grassroots movement grew icans. Unlike the Tea Party, however, rapidly from rallies to massive marches OWS did not have staying power. in financial districts nationwide, like Within a year, its energies and visi- this demonstration in downtown Los bility had waned, in part because of Angeles. mass arrests, in part because it was an ­intentionally ­“leaderless” movement more interested in saying what it was against than explaining what it was for.

Bold Decisions
 For all of the political sniping, however, attitudes toward “­hot-​­button” c­ ultural values were slowly changing. In December 2010, Congress repealed the “don’t ask, don’t tell” (DADT) military policy that, since 1993, had resulted in some 9,500 gay men and women being discharged from the armed forces. A year later, a report by army officers concluded that the repeal “had no o ­ verall ­negative impact on military readiness or its component dimensions, including cohesion, recruitment, retention, assaults, harassment, ormorale.”

 gay marriage

 In May 2012, President Obama became the first s­itting president to support the right of gay and lesbian couples to marry. That his statement came a day after the North Carolina legislature voted to

 1500  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 ban all rights for gay couples illustrated how incendiary the issue was. While ­asserting that it was the “right” thing to do, Obama knew that endorsing ­same-​­sex ­marriage had powerful political implications. The gay community would play an ­energetic role in the 2012 presidential election, and the youth v­ ote—​­the u ­ nder-​­thirty electorate who most supported gay ­marriage—​­would be ­crucial. No sooner had Obama made his announcement than polls showed that ­American voters for the first time were evenly split on the charged issue, with Democrats and independent ­voters providing the bulk of support for s­ ame-​­sex marriage.

 the dream act

 In June 2012, Obama again made waves by issuing an executive order (soon labeled the DREAM Act) that allowed 1.5 million undocumented immigrants who had been brought to the United States as children to remain as citizens. His unanticipated decision thrilled Hispanic supporters who had lost heart over his failure to convince Congress to support ­more-​­comprehensive immigration reform. Congressional Republicans steadfastly opposed giving the estimated 12 million undocumented immigrants, 80 percent of whom were Latinos, a “pathway to citizenship” without first ensuring that the border with Mexico was secured. The DREAM Act, however, had unexpected consequences. It excited masses of Central Americans willing to endure enormous risks to live in America. Panicked parents in El Salvador, Guatemala, and Honduras, worried about widespread ­drug-​­related gang violence, started sending their children through Mexico to the United States in hopes of connecting with relatives and being granted citizenship. During 2014, some 57,000 young migrants were caught along the nearly 2,000-­mile-​­long border with Mexico, and communities across the nation rushed to find families to “sponsor” the unaccompanied children. At the same time, the Obama administration was deporting record numbers of undocumented immigrants (more than 2 million by the end of 2014), some of whom had been working in the nation for decades, in what was called the “great expulsion.” Obama, called the “Deporter in Chief ” by critics, claimed that he was only following the laws written by a­ nti-​­immigration Republicans. Others suggested that the harsh deportation policy was part of Obama’s “grand strategy” to force Congress to pass a comprehensive immigration reform bill. Either way, the immigrants were caught in the middle.

 the supreme court in the twenty-first ­century The Supreme Court surprised observers in 2013 by overturning the Defense of Marriage Act (DOMA) of 1996, which had denied gay and lesbian ­couples

A
Historic New Presidency 1501 

 Refugees from gangland Braving hundreds of miles on foot, Honduran and Salvadorian children are sent off by their parents for a better life in the United States, away from the ­drug-​­dealing violence of Central America. Here, border guards stop a group of child refugees in Granjeno, Texas.

 who married in states allowing such unions the right to federal benefits. In United States v. Windsor (2013), the Court voted 5–4 that the federal ­government could not withhold spousal benefits from s­ ame-​­sex couples who had been legally married. While restoring federal benefits, the Court did not rule that ­same-​­sex marriage was a right guaranteed under the Constitution. That issue would have to be resolved by a future Court decision, scheduled for the ­summer of 2015. In the meantime, each state could decide whether to allow such marriages. During 2014, however, federal courts repeatedly ­overturned state laws banning s­ ame-​­sex marriages, arguing that the right to marry was guaranteed by the Constitution. While the Court disappointed social conservatives with its Windsor ­decision, its five conservative justices continued to make rulings intended to restrict the powers of the federal government. In June 2013, in Shelby County v. Holder (2013), the Court gutted key provisions of the 1965 Voting Rights Act (VRA), which had outlawed discrimination directed toward voters “on account of race or color.” The majority opinion declared that in five of the six southern states originally covered by the VRA, black voter turnout now exceeded white turnout.

 1502  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 To the judges, this seemed to prove that there was no evidence of continuing racial discrimination. Today’s laws “must be justified by current needs,” Chief Justice John Roberts wrote. Soon after the Court’s ruling, counties and states in the South pushed through new laws that had the effect of making it more difficult for minorities and poor people to vote by reducing voting hours or requiring that driver’s licenses be shown on voting days.

 the 2012 election

 As the November 2012 presidential election approached, one thing was certain: it would be the most expensive election ever, in part because the Supreme Court ruled in Citizens United v. Federal Elections Committee (2010) that corporations could spend as much as they wanted in support of candidates. After a divisive battle in the primaries, Mitt Romney, a former corporate executive and Massachusetts governor, won the Republican nomination. The main question for Romney was whether the s­ till-​­powerful religious Right would allow him to sidestep tough social issues; the question for President Obama was whether he could sidestep his failure to restore prosperity. Two factors injured Romney’s candidacy toward the end of the most expensive campaign in history ($6 billion). The first was his decision to please ­right-​­wing voters by opposing immigration reforms that might allow undocumented immigrants a pathway to citizenship. The second was the disclosure that he had privately told a group of wealthy contributors that he “did not care” about the 47 percent of Americans who failed “to take personal responsibility and care for their lives.” It was not his job “to worry about” those who did not pay federal income taxes because they were dependent on federal government programs. The Obama campaign seized on the impolitic statement and demonized the wealthy Romney as an uncaring elitist. On Election Day, Obama won with 66 million votes to Romney’s 61 million, and 332 electoral votes to 206. Nearly 60 percent of white voters chose Romney. But the nation’s fastest growing ­ groups—​­ Hispanics, Asian Americans, and African ­ Americans—​ ­voted overwhelmingly for Obama, as did c­ollege-​­educated women. David Frum, a prominent Republican speechwriter and columnist, confessed that his party was becoming “increasingly isolated and estranged from modern America.” Obama began his second term on an assertive note. In January 2013, the Defense Department lifted its ban on women serving in combat. The following month, Obama announced that more U.S. troops would be withdrawn from Afghanistan over the next year, leaving 34,000 by early 2014. It had become America’s longest war.

A
Historic New Presidency 1503 

 obamacare on the defensive

 President Obama’s proudest achievement, the Affordable Care Act, was so massive in its scope and complicated in its implementation that it took four years before it was ready to “roll out.” In the fall of 2013, the federal online health insurance “exchange,” where people without insurance could sign up, opened with great fanfare. Obama assured Americans that using the online registration system would be “real simple.” It was not. On October 1, millions tried to sign up; only six succeeded. As it turned out, the website had never been properly tested, and it was hobbled with technical glitches. It also became evident that Obama had misled the nation about key elements of the plan. In campaigning for its passage in 2010, he had repeatedly told voters that if they liked their current health insurance plan, they could, under Obamacare, “keep that insurance. Period. End of story.” As it turned out, however, many with substandard policies saw them canceled by insurers. Congressional Republicans, as well as many Democrats, condemned the president for his misleading statements and inept management of his signature program. During the winter of 2013–2014, the R ­ epublican-​­led House of Representatives repeatedly ­tried—​­and ­failed—​­to overturn the ACA, at one point passing a federal budget that would have stripped the new health care program of its funding. When the president refused to sign the bill, the federal government (some 800,000 employees) shut down after the existing budget expired on September 30. For sixteen days, every nonessential federal agency was closed, costing the government $2 billion. The Republicans’ shutdown strategy failed, however, as it had in 1995, when citizen outrage was directed not at President Clinton, but at ­Republican legislators. In response to widespread criticism and the threat of global ­economic repercussions, House Republicans on October 16 passed a revised, ­Senate-​­approved budget that removed the a­ nti-​­ACA provision. The conservative radio commentator Rush Limbaugh described the Republican shutdown as “one of the greatest political disasters I’ve ever seen.” Democrats had little time to celebrate, however. By November 2013, some 57 percent of voters said they opposed Obamacare, in part because the program benefited only a quarter of the population, the uninsured and the underinsured, and Obama’s job approval ratings had plunged. It had taken the president weeks to acknowledge the botched ­roll-​­out of Obamacare: “We created this problem we didn’t need to create,” he said to aides. “And it’s our own doing, and it’s our most important initiative,” and “nobody is madder than me.” Eventually, the ACA website was fixed, and by August 2014, more than 9 million people, well above the original target number, had signed up for

 1504  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 health insurance. “The Affordable Care Act is here to stay,” Obama said. But even though the s­ ign-​­up system was fixed, public perception of the government’s ability to manage the program never recovered.

New Global Challenges in an Age of Insecurity
 In 2013, the United States held its first ­high-​­level talks with Iran since 1979, when Iranian militants took U.S. embassy employees in Tehran hostage. On November 23, Secretary of State John Kerry reached a multinational agreement with Iran to scale back its nuclear development program for six months as a first step toward a more comprehensive agreement not to develop nuclear weapons. At the same time, an increasingly bloody civil war in Syria that had claimed 150,000 lives was beginning to have major international repercussions. In 2013, U.S. intelligence analysts confirmed that the Syrian government, ruled with an iron fist by Bashar a­ l-​­Assad, on August 21 had used chemical weapons to kill 1,400 people, many of them children. President Obama had repeatedly warned that such use of weapons of mass destruction was a “red line” that would trigger international ­military ­intervention of “enormous consequences.” In late August, he (and the French government) hesitantly began preparing for a military strike, although ­Congress and most Americans opposed such action. It appeared that Obama had gotten cold feet about a military intervention. His former secretary of defense, Leon ­Panetta, argued that Obama’s failure to follow through on his threat “was a blow to American credibility. When the president as commander in chief draws a red line, it is critical that he act if the line is crossed.” On September 9, Secretary of State Kerry defused the crisis by signing an agreement with Russia to dispose of Syria’s chemical weapons. By the end of October, all the chemical weapon stockpiles had been destroyed or ­dismantled, but the civil war raged on.

 ukraine

 As the Syrian civil war continued, a civil uprising occurred in Ukraine, the former Soviet republic of 46 million people that had gained its independence in 1991. For nearly a quarter of a century, Russian p ­ resident Vladimir Putin had viewed the disintegration of the Soviet Union as the “­ greatest geopolitical catastrophe of the century.” Like many Russian rulers before him, he developed an almost paranoid fear of being invaded from the west, either by armies or by democratic ideas. To restore Russian influence over its neighbors and to divide NATO and the European Union, he had exerted economic and political pressure on the republics of the former Soviet Union.

A
Historic New Presidency 1505 

 Civil war in Ukraine A protester in the Ukrainian capital of Kiev throws a Molotov cocktail during violent clashes with police on January 22, 2014. A month later, Russian President Vladimir Putin would use the unrest as an excuse to seize control of the Crimean region.

 On February 27, Putin sent troops into the Crimea, a part of Ukraine along the Black Sea long claimed by Russia. A week later, the Crimean parliament voted to become part of the Russian Federation. Putin, claiming that Crimea had “always been an inseparable part of Russia,” quickly made the illegal a­ nnexation official by positioning Russian troops there, while denying their presence. The speed and ruthlessness with which Putin seized control of Crimea, mobilized 40,000 Russian troops on the Ukrainian border, and cut off Ukraine’s crucial access to Russian natural gas surprised President Obama and E ­ uropean leaders. It may not have been the start of a new cold war, but it put an end to hope that Russia would become a cordial partner of the United States and the European democracies. By 2014 Putin had developed a raw and resentful ­anti-​­Americanism, fearful that the menacing United States (and NATO) was gaining influence in the former Soviet republics at the expense of Russia. In response, the United States and the European Union hurriedly o ­ rganized diplomatic efforts to “­de-​­escalate the crisis.” They refused to recognize the ­legitimacy of the annexation of Crimea and announced economic sanctions against Russia while pledging financial assistance to Ukraine. “If Russia

 1506  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century A ­ merica 1993–Present

 c­ ontinues to interfere in Ukraine, we stand ready to impose further sanctions,” Obama said. By a vote of 100–11, the United Nations General Assembly also opposed the annexation. In April 2014, heavily armed ­pro-​­Russian separatists, as many as a third of whom were Russian soldiers and agents, seized control of several cities in eastern Ukraine. They declared a “people’s republic” and called for secession. Pressure mounted to impose even more sanctions when a Malaysian passenger jet flying across eastern Ukraine was shot down by a R ­ ussian-​­made rocket in July 2014, killing all 298 on board. The United States and its allies slammed Russia with more economic sanctions, but the coldly calculating Putin showed no sign of backing away. In fact, his popularity in Russia had soared, leaving the United States once again in the position of containing Russia’s expansionist ambitions.

 the burdens of leadership

 Rarely are presidents more popular than on their first day in office. To govern is to make decisions, and decisions in democratic nations inevitably produce disappointments, disagreements, and criticism. During his presidency, Barack Obama has discovered how hard it is to lead the world’s economic and military superpower in the ­post–​­cold war era. He has struggled to stabilize a cluster of unstable n ­ ations—​­Iraq, Afghanistan, Libya, Ukraine, and ­Syria—​­that craved U.S. resources but resented American meddling. What unites the crises in Ukraine and the Middle East is the seeming powerlessness of Obama, European leaders, and the United Nations to resolve them easily or quickly in an age of growing insecurity and turmoil. Overall, Obama adopted a posture of restraint in world affairs. He was determined to “avoid stupid errors,” wind down the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, stay aloof from the Arab Awakening, and reduce the use of U.S. military power abroad so as to concentrate on issues at home. Yet he and others were naive to think that the United States could avoid the ­burdens of being the only superpower in a p ­ ost–​­cold war world of g­ rowing anarchy and violence. There is no diplomatic solution to be found for groups s­eeking the total destruction of the American and European d ­ emocracies. Democratic senator Diane Feinstein of California wondered out loud in ­September 2014 if Obama had become “too cautious” about the use of force in world affairs.

 islamists on the move

 Unexpected events overseas during the summer of 2014 gave Obama the opportunity to take decisive action. In June, the volatile Middle East took a sudden turn for the worse when Sunni jihadists who had been fighting in Syria invaded northern Iraq and announced the creation of their own nation (caliphate), called the Islamic State (ISIS). With lightning speed, the Islamic State emerged as the largest, ­best-​­financed, most

A
Historic New Presidency 1507 

 ­ eavily-​­armed, and most brutal of the many jihadist terrorist groups, financh ing its ­far-​­flung operations and 40,000 fanatical fighters by selling captured oil and ransoming hostages. ISIS was both the culmination of decades of Arab Islamist rage against Europe and the United States and the collapse of effective government and security in Syria and Iraq. Once American forces left Iraq and Sunnis grew frustrated with the ­Shia-​­dominated government, ISIS swept in, setting off a panic that helped topple the government. In the areas it captured, ISIS established its own tyrannical form of government based on what it called the “management of savagery.” In the face of the ISIS advance, many Iraqi government soldiers that the United States had spent billions of dollars training and equipping fled, leaving their valuable weapons and vehicles. Sadistic ISIS fighters seized huge tracts of territory in Syria and Iraq while enslaving, terrorizing, raping, massacring, crucifying, or beheading thousands of men, women, and children who in some way fell short of their ruthless version of the Sunni faith. In August 2014, after ISIS terrorists gruesomely beheaded two captured Americans, President Obama ordered “systematic” airstrikes, first in Iraq and later in Syria, to prevent genocide as ISIS fighters assaulted Christians, Yazidis, and Kurds in the region. Those airstrikes continue. Obama pulled off a diplomatic coup by building a broad coalition of Arab and European partners, but U.S. warplanes bore the brunt of the action. Obama assured Americans that he would not “get dragged into another ground war,” but the latest military intervention remained a bitter setback for a ­president committed to ending U.S. wars in the Middle East. If George W. Bush had plunged U.S. power too deeply into Iraq, Obama seemed to have w ­ ithdrawn U.S. power too quickly. One ­over-​­reached, the other ­under-​­shot. The stakes were high. Yousef al Otaiba, the ambassador of the United Arab Emirates to the United States, warned that the radical Islamist leaders of the Islamic State posed “an existential threat to those of us who believe in the true nature of Islam as a religion of peace.” Although some criticized Obama’s actions, he characterized the air campaign to slow the mass murder and mayhem by the Islamic State as “American leadership at its best.” Preventing genocide and deterring the world’s tyrants and terrorists from further mischief is not simply a burden of great power, he decided, it is a responsibility in an era burdened by constant warfare. During 2015, however, the stability and security in the Middle East desired and funded by the United States disintegrated. Civil wars between sectarian factions were engulfing Syria, Iraq, Libya, and Yemen. In 2015 the United States remained the world’s only superpower capable of projecting military power anywhere in the world. But the i­ll-​­considered wars in Afghanistan and Iraq had left many Americans deeply reluctant to support

 1508  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 any use of extensive military power that might involve a ­long-​­term commitment. The painful lessons of Afghanistan and Iraq showed that no nation, not even a superpower, could easily impose its will and its democratic system on people with very different needs, beliefs, and traditions.

The Age of Gridlock
 American politics has always been chaotic and combative; its raucous energy is one of its great strengths. During Barack Obama’s t­ wo-​­term presidency, however, the emergence of the Tea Party and Occupy Wall Street symbolized how savage and unyielding political combat had become. Compromise and moderation had become dirty words. The ­scorched-​­earth tactics of Republicans in Congress were designed to protect the political status quo. “We’re the party of ‘Hell, no!’” cried Sarah Palin, the former Republican governor of Alaska who had run for vice president alongside John McCain in 2008 before becoming the darling of the Tea Party. Intense partisanship dominated the 2014 congressional elections, when Republicans gained nine Senate seats, giving them control of the Senate for the first time since 2006. They also strengthened their hold on the House, added governorships, and tightened their control of state legislatures. Republicans campaigned on a single theme: the “failure” of President Obama and the “disaster” of Obamacare. Kentucky senator Rand Paul vowed that he and his colleagues would send “the president bill after bill until he wearies of it,” including renewed efforts to repeal Obamacare. Political moderates became a dying breed. By late 2014, the percentage of voters who described themselves as liberals or conservatives had doubled since 1994, and more than twice as many Democratic and Republican voters as in 1994 had a “very unfavorable” view of the other party. Congress included mostly Republicans on the far right, Democrats on the far left, and hardly anyone in the middle. “That alignment,” said Gerald Seib of the Wall Street Journal, created a Congress “that does less, and does it less well, than any time in memory.” By 2014, six years after taking office on the promise of “hope and change,” President Obama had discovered how difficult it is to preside over a polarized nation, much less bring it together. “You know I love this job,” Obama told an adviser early in his presidency. “I love diving into problems. But dealing with some of the people you have to deal with . . . ​wears you out.” In the final two years of his presidency, Obama’s greying hair and waning energy revealed a weariness that mirrored his public approval ratings, which were well below 50 percent. James Bennet, editor of the Atlantic Monthly,

A
Historic New Presidency 1509 

 pointed out that every modern t­wo-​­term president had experienced plummeting support. “If we weren’t sick of the guy to start with, we certainly are by now. What once seemed like roguish charm, or bracing surety, or nuanced intelligence, has curdled into ­self-​­indulgence, or arrogance, or passivity.” Voters hoping for a more energetic and engaged Obama after his reelection were disappointed by his slow withdrawal from engaged leadership. He seemed disheartened by the troubling “gap between the magnitude of our challenges and the smallness of our politics.” Critics savaged him for playing golf more often than any president since Eisenhower. Even prominent Democrats joined in the attacks. A successful presidency, former secretary of state Hillary Clinton said, needed “organizing principles, and ‘Don’t do stupid stuff ’ is not an organizing principle.” Obama repeatedly blamed Republicans for stalemating his second term, but the president was not blameless. Cabinet member Leon Panetta stressed that Obama’s “most conspicuous weakness” was “a frustrating reticence to engage his opponents and rally support for his cause.” While acknowledging that the president was “supremely intelligent,” Panetta added that Obama “avoids the battle, complains, and misses opportunities.” Obama was a talented man drawn to political power but frustrated by ­horse-​­trading politics, a leader eager to have power but increasingly reluctant to e­xercise it. To many Americans, his naturally cautious and careful approach to foreign policy came across as indecisive and weak, and his coolness smacked of ­aloofness. “George W. Bush was a leader who didn’t like to think,” said Ian Bremmer, an international consultant. “Barack Obama is a thinker who doesn’t like to lead.”

 renewed energy

 Yet during the summer of 2015, in the sunset of his presidency, Obama regained his energy and momentum. While restoring normal relations with Cuba, he benefited from two surprising U.S. Supreme Court rulings in late June. For years, Republicans had waged all-out war on the Affordable Care Act (Obamacare). Unable to halt the implementation of the new program in Congress, the critics turned to the courts to challenge the “flawed” new health care law. In a surprising 6-3 decision in a case called King v. Burwell, the Supreme Court saved the controversial health care law that will define Obama’s presidency for generations to come. Chief Justice Roberts explained in the majority opinion that some of the sloppy language in the original Congressional legislation should not be used to destroy the new program. “Congress passed the Affordable Care Act to improve health insurance markets, not to destroy them,” Roberts stressed. “If at all possible, we must interpret the Act in a way that is consistent with the former, and avoids the

 1510  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century ­A merica 1993–Present

 Married with pride A California couple pose in front of the United States Supreme Court building in Washington, D.C., while the Supreme Court justices hear arguments on the constitutional right for gay couples to wed in April 2015. On June 26, 2015, in a landmark 5-4 decision, the Court ruled in favor of upholding same-sex marriage in all fifty states.

 latter.” President Obama was overjoyed by the much-anticipated ruling. “Five years ago, after nearly a century of talk, decades of trying, a year of bipartisan debate, we finally declared that in America, health care is not a privilege for a few but a right for all,” Obama said from the White House. “The Affordable Care Act is here to stay.” Then, just a day later, the U.S. Supreme Court issued another bombshell ruling when it announced a 5-4 decision in the Obergefell v. Hodges case, which banned states from preventing same-sex marriages. The landmark decision that same-sex couples had a constitutional right to marry infuriated the Religious Right. Rick Scarborough, a Baptist minister in Texas, vowed that he and others would “denounce this practice in our [religious] services, we will not teach it in our schools, we will refuse to officiate at this type of wedding, and we will not accept any encroachments on our First Amendment rights.” Yet the Supreme Court’s affirmation of same-sex marriage reflected the profound change in public attitudes toward homosexual rights during the early twenty-first century. In 2008, presidential candidate Barack Obama had felt

A
Historic New Presidency 1511 

 the need to disavow support for marriage equality. By 2012, he had reversed himself by embracing the right of same-sex marriage. His change of mind reflected a resurgent social transformation in American life. Cultural diversity, like Obamacare, was here to stay. Obama, for example, the nation’s first African American president, had appointed two women to the U.S. Supreme Court, including the first Latina justice. He also ended the ban on open homosexuality in the military. The unexpected momentum of the Court decisions in June 2015 bolstered Obama’s efforts in another controversial arena: foreign policy. In his 2009 inaugural address, he had vowed to international enemies that “we will extend a hand if you are willing to unclench your fist.” That effort finally paid off in 2015, not only with the normalizing of relations with Cuba but also when the United States and five other major world powers announced a draft treaty with Iran intended to thwart its efforts to develop a nuclear weapon. In exchange for ending the international trade embargo against Iran, the agreement called for the Iranians to dismantle much of their nuclear program and allow for international inspectors to confirm their actions. Obama warned Congressional critics that voting against such a treaty would mean “a greater chance of war in the Middle East.”

A
Fading American Dream?  When Barack Obama won the Democratic nomination for president in 2008, he and his supporters touted him as an uplifting example of the American Dream, a biracial man who had defied the odds and achieved great success. His inspiring story echoed one of the most powerful themes in the nation’s history: America as a mythic land of unique opportunities for people from around the world. In 1811, former president John Adams marveled at the growth and prosperity of the young American republic: “There is no people on earth so ambitious as the people of America . . . ​because the lowest [poorest] can aspire [to wealth] as freely as the highest.” The ideal of equal opportunity has always been the engine of American distinctiveness. By the early ­twenty-​­first century, though, that ideal seemed increasingly out of reach to millions. The most striking change in modern life since 1980 was the widening inequality of income and wealth. Modern America had become a tale of two very different societies in which “the rich get richer and the poor get poorer,” to quote a famous song. A rising wealth gap between rich and poor unfairly punishes those who have the bad luck to be born and raised in poverty, with little access to quality education, health care, and learning technologies. While the wealthy feel financially secure, the masses feel

 1512  CHAPTER 32  Twenty-​­First-​Century A ­ merica 1993–Present

 increasingly insecure against unexpected hardships and a r­ apidly changing ­high-​­tech economy that places a premium on higher education. As Nobel ­Prize–​­winning economist Joseph Stiglitz said in 2012, “the United States has less equality of opportunity than almost any other advanced industrial country.” The American ­ dream of the poor having an equal chance to succeed economically, he said, was now more of a myth. Most of the ­economic benefits generated by the slow economic recovery under Obama were enjoyed by ­salaried executives and stockholders rather than the working ­ and middle classes. Although unemployRaising the minimum wage ment dropped below 6 percent in 2015, Demonstrators rally in Albany, New York, for an increase to the wages had barely risen since 2007. In minimum wage, a movement that gained 1979, the richest 1 ­percent, mostly people national traction in 2014 and reflected engaged in global ­investment, banking, the growing attention paid to wealth and business, controlled 9 percent of the disparity in the country. nation’s total income. By 2014, they controlled more than 20 percent. The 46 million Americans living below the official poverty line in 2014 ($11,702 annual income for an individual, $23,850 for a family of four) were the most in history. One of every five children lived in poverty. At the other extreme, corporate executives were reaping an e­ver-​­higher percentage of national wealth. In 1993, the disparity in pay between corporate leaders and the average U.S. worker was 195 to 1; in 2012, it was 360 to 1. “Increasingly,” journalist Hedrick Smith reported in 2012, America is becoming a society in which “privilege sustains privilege; poverty begets poverty,” resulting in the “slow, poisonous polarization and disintegration of our great democracy.” Whatever its causes, what came to be called the “great divide” between the “1 percent” and the “99 percent” had profound social and political consequences, as well as moral dimensions. A nation founded on the idea that “All men are created equal” had become richer but less equal and less socially mobile than other advanced industrial nations. The true test of a capitalist democracy is not how wealthy the richest citizens are, but the quality of life of the average citizen.

A
Historic New Presidency 1513 

 The unresolved tension created by such inequality emerged as the foremost social issue of the t­ wenty-​­first century. In an August 2014 national poll, 64 percent of Americans no longer believed that the nation offered everyone an equal chance to succeed, fewer than 10 percent trusted Congress, and 76 percent were not confident that the quality of life of their children’s generation would be “better than it has been for us.” Billionaire investor Bill Gross worried in 2014 that the new ­high-​­tech global economy was “producing one world for the rich and an entirely different world for the working class. It can’t go on like this, either from the standpoint of the health of the capitalist system itself or the health of individuals and the family.” As the 2016 presidential campaign began in earnest, income inequality emerged as a major issue. Democratic frontrunner Hillary Clinton claimed she was reaching out to “everyday Americans” by calling for higher wages while criticizing the “bloated” salaries of corporate executives. Florida senator Marco Rubio urged his fellow Republicans to make their party “the champion of the working class.” The United States has so far survived its growing economic inequalities and social strife without serious upheavals. For all its diversity and divisions, the nation remains united under a common government and political system, something that few societies can claim. For centuries, Americans have also displayed a distinctively ­self-​­critical temperament, especially noticeable to foreign visitors. In the early nineteenth century, English writer Charles Dickens said that the American “always is depressed, and always is stagnated, and always is at an alarming crisis, and never was otherwise.” Perhaps that is why the nation always overcomes its greatest crises; Americans eventually summon the will and creativity to address their urgent problems. The nation has a remarkable genius for s­elf-​­renewal and a confident ability to maneuver through the most difficult threats and challenges. It needs such innovative resilience today, for unless the entwined ideals of equal opportunity and fair reward are addressed, Americans may lose what has always united them and informed their sense of purpose: the widely shared hope, even expectation, of a better future for all based on hard work, ingenuity, and sacrifice.

CHAPTER REVIEW
Summary • 
 Changing Demographics From 1980 to 2010, the population of the United States grew by 25 percent, to 306 million. The nation was quickly becoming even more racially and ethnically diverse, and a wave of immigration from Latin America allowed Hispanics to surpass African Americans as the nation’s largest minority. By 2012, the U.S. population included more ­foreign-​­born and ­first-​­generation residents than ever before.

•


 Divided Government Just two years after the election of “New Democrat” Bill Clinton in 1992, Republican Speaker of the House Newt Gingrich crafted his Contract with America and achieved a Republican landslide in the midterm elections of 1994. Despite the bipartisan success of the 1993 North American Free Trade Act (NAFTA) and the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Act of 1996—and a prosperous, ­high-​­tech “new economy” that helped balance the federal b ­ udget—​­Clinton’s private life ­produced a sex scandal that resulted in impeachment proceedings against him. ­Clinton was ultimately acquitted and went on to intervene in the Balkans to stop ethnic cleansing and to broker the l­and-​­for-​­peace Wye River Accords in the Middle East.

•


 Global Terrorism The 9/11 a­ ttacks led President George W. Bush to declare a war on terror that commenced with the U.S. invasion of Afghanistan to capture Osama bin Laden and oust the Islamist Taliban government. Through the USA Patriot Act, Congress authorized the federal government to monitor Americans for possible terrorist activities at home. The Bush Doctrine declared America’s right to initiate preemptive military strikes against terrorists or rogue nations possessing weapons of mass destruction (WMDs). In 2003, Bush invoked this doctrine against Saddam Hussein, the leader of Iraq. The ensuing second Iraq War removed Hussein from power but turned up no WMDs.

•


A
Historic Election The 2008 presidential primary campaigns featured Democratic senators Hillary Rodham Clinton, the first formidable female candidate, and Barack Obama, the first truly contending African American candidate, as well as Republican senator John McCain, the oldest candidate in history. Obama won his party’s nomination and went on to take the election, becoming the nation’s first African American president. His victory resulted in large part from public dismay about the Great Recession, as well as voters’ weariness with President Bush. 
•


 Obama’s Priorities Obama’s first priority was to shore up the failing economy, which he attempted through controversial Wall Street “bailouts” and a huge “economic stimulus” package. Yet the recovery remained slow and unequal, widening the economic divide and spawning the ­short-​­lived Occupy Wall Street movement. The Affordable Care Act (Obamacare) incited increasingly bitter opposition from the conservative Tea Party. Obama was more successful in winning public support to reduce American military deployment abroad, removing all combat troops



 from Iraq in 2011 and downsizing their presence in Afghanistan. Obama also intervened in the nation’s culture wars, endorsing ­same-​­sex marriage and a path to citizenship for undocumented residents.

Chronology
 Bill Clinton elected president



 1993	Congress passes NAFTA 1995	The Contract with America 1996	Congress passes PRWOA 1998	President Clinton impeached and acquitted 2000	George W. Bush elected after controversial recount September 11, 2001	Terrorists attack New York City

 Operation Enduring Freedom begins in Afghanistan March 2003 Iraq War begins with Operation Iraqi Freedom August 2005	Hurricane Katrina devastates Gulf coast Global financial markets collapse; Great Recession begins 2009	Barack Obama becomes the nation’s first black president Congress passes the Affordable Care Act (Obamacare) August 2011 Al Qaeda leader Osama bin Laden killed 2013	U.S. Supreme Court overturns the Defense of Marriage Act (DOMA) in United States v. Windsor 2015	U.S. Supreme Court upholds the Affordable Care Act and decides that same-sex couples have a constitutional right to marry October 2001

Key Terms


North American Free Trade
 Agreement (NAFTA) p. 1463

USA
Patriot Act (2001) p. 1479 
 Contract with America p. 1464

 weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) p. 1480

Personal Responsibility and Work
 Opportunity Act of 1996 (PRWOA) p. 1466 globalization p. 1467 ethnic cleansing p. 1470 war on terror p. 1478

Bush Doctrine p. 1480


Great Recession p. 1487
 Affordable Care Act (­ACA—​­also called Obamacare) p. 1491 Tea Party p. 1497 ­same-​­sex marriage p. 1500

IJK
Go to InQuizitive to see what you’ve learned—and learn what you’ve missed—with personalized feedback along the way. 
